1 | break (noun): a short rest from work or study | loc: přestávka
  EN TS: His "short" break is too long.
  cz TS: Jeho „krátká“ přestávka je moc dlouhá.
  EN FS: His "short" run is too long.
  cz FS: Jeho „krátký“ běh je moc dlouhý.
  EN TP: a short phone break
  cz TP: krátká přestávka na mobil
  EN FP: a short coffee break
  cz FP: krátká přestávka na kafe
2 | certificate (noun): official proof that you finished a course | loc: certifikát
  EN TS: She has so many certificates!
  cz TS: Ta má tolik certifikátů!
  EN FS: She has so many medals!
  cz FS: Ta má tolik medailí!
  EN TP: showing her certificates
  cz TP: ukazuje své certifikáty
  EN FP: printing her certificates
  cz FP: tiskne své certifikáty
3 | class (noun): teaching given as a series of lessons | loc: třída
  EN TS: Her class is crazy!
  cz TS: Její třída je šílená!
  EN FS: Her class is sleeping!
  cz FS: Její třída spí!
  EN TP: a class out of control
  cz TP: třída úplně mimo kontrolu
  EN FP: a class trip abroad
  cz FP: třídní výlet do zahraničí
4 | course (noun): a series of lessons on one subject | loc: kurz
  EN TS: She has an online course.
  cz TS: Má online kurz.
  EN FS: She has an online meeting.
  cz FS: Má online schůzku.
  EN TP: an online course at home
  cz TP: online kurz z domova
  EN FP: a cooking course at school
  cz FP: kurz vaření ve škole
6 | cushion (noun): a soft pillow-like pad you sit or lean on | loc: polštář
  EN TS: One cushion is not enough.
  cz TS: Jeden polštář nestačí.
  EN FS: One chair is not enough.
  cz FS: Jedna židle nestačí.
  EN TP: a pile of cushions
  cz TP: hromada polštářů
  EN FP: a pile of blankets
  cz FP: hromada dek
7 | graduation (noun): the ceremony where you receive your diploma | loc: promoce
  EN TS: It is his graduation day.
  cz TS: Je to jeho promoce.
  EN FS: It is her graduation day.
  cz FS: Je to její promoce.
  EN TP: a graduation ceremony
  cz TP: slavnostní promoce
  EN FP: a graduation present
  cz FP: dárek k promoci
8 | keycard (noun): a plastic card that unlocks an electronic lock | loc: klíčová karta
  EN TS: She blamed the keycard. Wrong door.
  cz TS: Svedla to na klíčovou kartu. Špatné dveře.
  EN FS: She blamed the suitcase. Wrong door.
  cz FS: Svedla to na kufr. Špatné dveře.
  EN TP: tapping the keycard
  cz TP: přikládá klíčovou kartu
  EN FP: losing the keycard
  cz FP: ztrácí klíčovou kartu
9 | laboratory (noun): a room with equipment for doing experiments | loc: laboratoř
  EN TS: This is a busy laboratory.
  cz TS: Tohle je rušná laboratoř.
  EN FS: This is a busy kitchen.
  cz FS: Tohle je rušná kuchyně.
  EN TP: working in a laboratory
  cz TP: práce v laboratoři
  EN FP: cleaning a laboratory
  cz FP: úklid laboratoře
10 | leaf (noun): one of the flat green parts growing on a tree | loc: list
  EN TS: A leaf is a free umbrella!
  cz TS: List je deštník zdarma!
  EN FS: A leaf is a free blanket!
  cz FS: List je deka zdarma!
  EN TP: a giant green leaf
  cz TP: obří zelený list
  EN FP: a giant green frog
  cz FP: obří zelená žába
11 | library (noun): a place full of books you can read or borrow | loc: knihovna
  EN TS: This library is huge!
  cz TS: Tahle knihovna je obrovská!
  EN FS: This library is tiny!
  cz FS: Tahle knihovna je malinká!
  EN TP: a huge old library
  cz TP: obrovská stará knihovna
  EN FP: a small school library
  cz FP: malá školní knihovna
13 | napkin (noun): a piece of cloth or paper to wipe your mouth | loc: ubrousek
  EN TS: Her napkin is a work of art!
  cz TS: Její ubrousek je umělecké dílo!
  EN FS: Her cake is a work of art!
  cz FS: Její dort je umělecké dílo!
  EN TP: folding a napkin
  cz TP: skládání ubrousku
  EN FP: a napkin on the floor
  cz FP: ubrousek na zemi
14 | page (noun): one side of a sheet of paper in a book | loc: stránka
  EN TS: A flower is going on the page.
  cz TS: Na stránku přijde květina.
  EN FS: A photo is going on the page.
  cz FS: Na stránku přijde fotka.
  EN TP: a page with flowers
  cz TP: stránka s květinami
  EN FP: a page in a newspaper
  cz FP: stránka v novinách
15 | pill (noun): a small round medicine that you swallow | loc: tableta
  EN TS: One pill and he is fine.
  cz TS: Jedna tableta a je v pohodě.
  EN FS: One coffee and he is fine.
  cz FS: Jedno kafe a je v pohodě.
  EN TP: swallowing a white pill
  cz TP: polyká bílou tabletu
  EN FP: a pill for sleeping
  cz FP: tableta na spaní
16 | presentation (noun): a talk where you show your work to a group | loc: prezentace
  EN TS: She is giving a presentation.
  cz TS: Právě má prezentaci.
  EN FS: She is giving a concert.
  cz FS: Právě má koncert.
  EN TP: giving a presentation
  cz TP: přednáší prezentaci
  EN FP: watching a presentation
  cz FP: sleduje prezentaci
17 | project (noun): a planned piece of work that takes time | loc: projekt
  EN TS: The project: one wooden shed.
  cz TS: Projekt: jedna dřevěná kůlna.
  EN FS: The project: one wooden boat.
  cz FS: Projekt: jedna dřevěná loďka.
  EN TP: a big shed project
  cz TP: velký projekt kůlny
  EN FP: a school project on paper
  cz FP: školní projekt na papíře
18 | root (noun): the part of a plant that grows under the ground | loc: kořen
  EN TS: She is washing the roots.
  cz TS: Myje kořeny.
  EN FS: She is cutting the roots.
  cz FS: Stříhá kořeny.
  EN TP: rinsing the roots
  cz TP: oplachování kořenů
  EN FP: roots of a big tree
  cz FP: kořeny velkého stromu
19 | ruler (noun): a flat stick for measuring and drawing lines | loc: pravítko
  EN TS: He found a ruler at last!
  cz TS: Konečně našel pravítko!
  EN FS: He found a pencil at last!
  cz FS: Konečně našel tužku!
  EN TP: drawing with a ruler
  cz TP: kreslení s pravítkem
  EN FP: drawing with a compass
  cz FP: kreslení s kružítkem
20 | schedule (noun): a plan of the things you must do and when | loc: rozvrh
  EN TS: Full schedule, but sleep wins!
  cz TS: Nabitý rozvrh, ale spánek vítězí!
  EN FS: Full schedule, but work wins!
  cz FS: Nabitý rozvrh, ale práce vítězí!
  EN TP: a full schedule
  cz TP: nabitý rozvrh
  EN FP: a bus schedule
  cz FP: jízdní řád autobusu
21 | school (noun): a place where children go to learn | loc: škola
  EN TS: Welcome to my school, bro.
  cz TS: Vítej v mý škole, brácho.
  EN FS: Welcome to my office, bro.
  cz FS: Vítej v mý kanceláři, brácho.
  EN TP: a tour of my school
  cz TP: prohlídka mé školy
  EN FP: a tour of my office
  cz FP: prohlídka mé kanceláře
22 | scientist (noun): a person who studies nature and does experiments | loc: vědec
  EN TS: The scientist loves charts.
  cz TS: Vědec zbožňuje grafy.
  EN FS: The student loves charts.
  cz FS: Student zbožňuje grafy.
  EN TP: a scientist with a clipboard
  cz TP: vědec s psací podložkou
  EN FP: a scientist with a microscope
  cz FP: vědec s mikroskopem
23 | speech (noun): a formal talk given to an audience | loc: projev | translator note: FP pun speech bubble not possible, used comic speech bubble without loc
  EN TS: She is giving a formal speech.
  cz TS: Má slavnostní projev.
  EN FS: She is giving a short concert.
  cz FS: Má krátký koncert.
  EN TP: a heartfelt speech
  cz TP: dojemný projev
  EN FP: a speech bubble
  cz FP: komiksová bublina s textem
24 | spoon (noun): a tool with a small bowl for eating liquid food | loc: lžíce
  EN TS: Her spoon emptied the whole bowl!
  cz TS: Její lžíce vyprázdnila celou misku!
  EN FS: Her fork emptied the whole bowl!
  cz FS: Její vidlička vyprázdnila celou misku!
  EN TP: a spoon full of soup
  cz TP: lžíce plná polévky
  EN FP: a spoon full of sugar
  cz FP: lžíce plná cukru
25 | stapler (noun): a tool that joins papers with small metal clips | loc: sešívačka
  EN TS: His stapler never gives up!
  cz TS: Jeho sešívačka se nikdy nevzdává!
  EN FS: His printer never gives up!
  cz FS: Jeho tiskárna se nikdy nevzdává!
  EN TP: a red stapler
  cz TP: červená sešívačka
  EN FP: a broken stapler
  cz FP: rozbitá sešívačka
26 | straw (noun): a thin tube you drink through | loc: brčko
  EN TS: His straw works super fast!
  cz TS: Jeho brčko jede fakt rychle!
  EN FS: His spoon works super fast!
  cz FS: Jeho lžička jede fakt rychle!
  EN TP: a striped bendy straw
  cz TP: pruhované ohebné brčko
  EN FP: a straw sun hat
  cz FP: slaměný klobouk
27 | student (noun): a person who learns at a school or college | loc: student
  EN TS: This student ices her coffee.
  cz TS: Tahle studentka si dává kafe s ledem.
  EN FS: This student heats her coffee.
  cz FS: Tahle studentka si ohřívá kafe.
  EN TP: a student with cold coffee
  cz TP: studentka s ledovým kafem
  EN FP: a student with hot soup
  cz FP: studentka s horkou polévkou
28 | subject (noun): a thing you learn at school, like maths | loc: předmět
  EN TS: School offers many subjects.
  cz TS: Škola nabízí spoustu předmětů.
  EN FS: School offers two subjects.
  cz FS: Škola nabízí dva předměty.
  EN TP: many school subjects
  cz TP: spousta školních předmětů
  EN FP: the subject of an email
  cz FP: předmět e-mailu
29 | telescope (noun): a tube with lenses for seeing far things | loc: dalekohled
  EN TS: Her telescope shows a meteor!
  cz TS: Její dalekohled ukazuje meteor!
  EN FS: Her telescope shows a rocket!
  cz FS: Její dalekohled ukazuje raketu!
  EN TP: a telescope on a tripod
  cz TP: dalekohled na stativu
  EN FP: a telescope on a ship
  cz FP: dalekohled na lodi
30 | textbook (noun): a book used for learning a school subject | loc: učebnice
  EN TS: This textbook never ends.
  cz TS: Tahle učebnice nemá konec.
  EN FS: This movie never ends.
  cz FS: Tenhle film nemá konec.
  EN TP: a very thick textbook
  cz TP: hodně tlustá učebnice
  EN FP: a very thin textbook
  cz FP: hodně tenká učebnice
31 | university (noun): a place to study for a degree after school | loc: univerzita
  EN TS: Week five: the university is empty.
  cz TS: Pátý týden: univerzita je prázdná.
  EN FS: Week five: the university is full.
  cz FS: Pátý týden: univerzita je plná.
  EN TP: an empty university hall
  cz TP: prázdná aula univerzity
  EN FP: an empty university library
  cz FP: prázdná univerzitní knihovna
32 | word (noun): a group of letters that has a meaning | loc: slovo
  EN TS: They are playing a word game.
  cz TS: Hrají hru se slovy.
  EN FS: They are playing a card game.
  cz FS: Hrají hru s kartami.
  EN TP: a fast word game
  cz TP: rychlá hra se slovy
  EN FP: a fast card game
  cz FP: rychlá karetní hra
33 | ache (noun): a continuous dull pain, like in a tooth | loc: bolest
  EN TS: Coffee makes the ache worse!
  cz TS: Kafe tu bolest jen zhoršuje!
  EN FS: Ice makes the ache worse!
  cz FS: Led tu bolest jen zhoršuje!
  EN TP: an ache in the jaw
  cz TP: bolest v čelisti
  EN FP: an ache in the back
  cz FP: bolest v zádech
34 | activity (noun): something you do for fun or exercise | loc: aktivita
  EN TS: Badminton: a great activity.
  cz TS: Badminton: skvělá aktivita.
  EN FS: Tennis: a great activity.
  cz FS: Tenis: skvělá aktivita.
  EN TP: an afternoon activity outside
  cz TP: odpolední aktivita venku
  EN FP: an activity for rainy days
  cz FP: aktivita na deštivé dny
35 | actor (noun): a man who plays roles in films or plays | loc: herec
  EN TS: The actor deserves an Oscar!
  cz TS: Ten herec si zaslouží Oscara!
  EN FS: The singer deserves an Oscar!
  cz FS: Ten zpěvák si zaslouží Oscara!
  EN TP: an actor on set
  cz TP: herec při natáčení
  EN FP: an actor on a poster
  cz FP: herec na plakátu
36 | adore (verb): to love someone or something very much | loc: zbožňovat
  EN TS: She adores this cat so much!
  cz TS: Tuhle kočku prostě zbožňuje!
  EN FS: She adores this dog so much!
  cz FS: Tohohle psa prostě zbožňuje!
  EN TP: adoring her orange cat
  cz TP: zbožňuje svou zrzavou kočku
  EN FP: adoring her orange dog
  cz FP: zbožňuje svého zrzavého psa
37 | advance (verb): to move forward towards a goal | loc: postupovat
  EN TS: The team is advancing to the goal.
  cz TS: Tým postupuje k cíli.
  EN FS: The team is advancing to the hut.
  cz FS: Tým postupuje k chatě.
  EN TP: advancing to the summit
  cz TP: postupují na vrchol
  EN FP: advancing to the final
  cz FP: postupují do finále
38 | airport (noun): a place where planes take off and land | loc: letiště
  EN TS: Heavy traffic at the airport today.
  cz TS: Na letišti je dnes hustý provoz.
  EN FS: No traffic at the airport today.
  cz FS: Na letišti dnes není žádný provoz.
  EN TP: a busy airport runway
  cz TP: rušná ranvej letiště
  EN FP: an airport shop
  cz FP: obchod na letišti
39 | ambulance (noun): a vehicle that takes sick people to hospital | loc: sanitka
  EN TS: An ambulance is pulling over.
  cz TS: Sanitka zajíždí ke kraji.
  EN FS: A taxi is pulling over.
  cz FS: Taxík zajíždí ke kraji.
  EN TP: an ambulance on a street
  cz TP: sanitka na ulici
  EN FP: an ambulance on a motorway
  cz FP: sanitka na dálnici
40 | answer (noun): what you say or write back to a question | loc: odpověď
  EN TS: She hates the answer.
  cz TS: Tu odpověď nesnáší!
  EN FS: She loves the answer.
  cz FS: Tu odpověď miluje!
  EN TP: an answer from a card
  cz TP: odpověď z kartičky
  EN FP: an answer from a friend
  cz FP: odpověď od kamarádky
41 | argument (noun): an angry talk where people disagree | loc: hádka
  EN TS: Just a small argument.
  cz TS: Jen malá hádka.
  EN FS: Just a small kiss.
  cz FS: Jen malá pusa.
  EN TP: an argument about a picture
  cz TP: hádka kvůli obrazu
  EN FP: an argument about money
  cz FP: hádka kvůli penězům
42 | exam (noun): a test of what you know at school | loc: zkouška
  EN TS: This exam is too hard for him.
  cz TS: Tahle zkouška je na něj moc těžká.
  EN FS: This exam is too easy for him.
  cz FS: Tahle zkouška je na něj moc lehká.
  EN TP: giving up on the exam
  cz TP: vzdává to u zkoušky
  EN FP: passing the exam
  cz FP: úspěšně skládá zkoušku
44 | anger (noun): the strong feeling of being annoyed or furious | loc: hněv
  EN TS: So much anger over a bag of flowers!
  cz TS: Tolik hněvu kvůli tašce kytek!
  EN FS: So much anger over a bag of apples!
  cz FS: Tolik hněvu kvůli tašce jablek!
  EN TP: anger at the flower market
  cz TP: hněv na trhu s květinami
  EN FP: anger at a traffic jam
  cz FP: hněv v zácpě
45 | angry (adjective): feeling very mad and upset with someone | loc: naštvaný
  EN TS: She is angry at the man!
  cz TS: Je naštvaná na toho chlapa!
  EN FS: She is angry at the dog!
  cz FS: Je naštvaná na toho psa!
  EN TP: an angry woman
  cz TP: naštvaná žena
  EN FP: angry about the rain
  cz FP: naštvaná kvůli dešti
46 | apple (noun): a round fruit with red or green skin | loc: jablko
  EN TS: That apple looks so crispy!
  cz TS: To jablko vypadá fakt křupavě!
  EN FS: That pear looks so crispy!
  cz FS: Ta hruška vypadá fakt křupavě!
  EN TP: biting a red apple
  cz TP: kousání do červeného jablka
  EN FP: baking an apple pie
  cz FP: pečení jablečného koláče
47 | arena (noun): a big indoor hall with seats around a court | loc: aréna
  EN TS: The arena is packed. Insane!
  cz TS: Aréna je narvaná. Šílený!
  EN FS: The arena is empty. Insane!
  cz FS: Aréna je prázdná. Šílený!
  EN TP: a packed indoor arena
  cz TP: plná krytá aréna
  EN FP: an empty indoor arena
  cz FP: prázdná krytá aréna
48 | arrive (verb): to reach a place at the end of a trip | loc: přijet
  EN TS: He arrived and he is so happy!
  cz TS: Přijel a je tak šťastný!
  EN FS: He arrived and he is so sad!
  cz FS: Přijel a je tak smutný!
  EN TP: arriving at a beach hotel
  cz TP: příjezd do hotelu na pláži
  EN FP: arriving at the office
  cz FP: příjezd do kanceláře
49 | arrow (noun): the thin feathered stick you shoot from a bow | loc: šíp
  EN TS: Her arrow hit the bullseye.
  cz TS: Její šíp trefil střed terče.
  EN FS: Her arrow hit the tree.
  cz FS: Její šíp trefil strom.
  EN TP: an arrow in the bullseye
  cz TP: šíp ve středu terče
  EN FP: an arrow on the sign
  cz FP: šíp na ukazateli
50 | jar (noun): a small glass pot with a lid | loc: kelímek
  EN TS: The jars look like cake!
  cz TS: Ty kelímky vypadají jako dort!
  EN FS: The jars look like soup!
  cz FS: Ty kelímky vypadají jako polévka!
  EN TP: filling small glass jars
  cz TP: plnění malých skleněných kelímků
  EN FP: opening small glass jars
  cz FP: otevírání malých skleněných kelímků
51 | squeeze (verb): to press something firmly together with your hand | loc: stisknout | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Squeezing slime is so satisfying.
  cz TS: Stískat sliz je fakt uspokojivý.
  EN FS: Squeezing clay is so satisfying.
  cz FS: Stískat modelínu je fakt uspokojivý.
  EN TP: squeezing colorful slime
  cz TP: stískání barevného slizu
  EN FP: squeezing a lemon
  cz FP: stískání citronu
52 | assistant (noun): a person whose job is to help someone | loc: asistent
  EN TS: The assistant does everything.
  cz TS: Asistent dělá všechno.
  EN FS: The model does everything.
  cz FS: Model dělá všechno.
  EN TP: a helpful assistant
  cz TP: ochotný asistent
  EN FP: a shop assistant
  cz FP: asistent prodeje
53 | athletics (noun): track-and-field sports like running and jumping | loc: atletika
  EN TS: This is athletics at its best.
  cz TS: Tohle je atletika v nejlepší formě.
  EN FS: This is swimming at its best.
  cz FS: Tohle je plavání v nejlepší formě.
  EN TP: athletics at a stadium
  cz TP: atletika na stadionu
  EN FP: athletics on television
  cz FP: atletika v televizi
54 | atm (noun): the machine in the street that gives you cash | loc: bankomat
  EN TS: ATM cash for sunflowers!
  cz TS: Peníze z bankomatu na slunečnice!
  EN FS: ATM cash for pizza!
  cz FS: Peníze z bankomatu na pizzu!
  EN TP: taking cash from an ATM
  cz TP: výběr z bankomatu
  EN FP: an ATM keeping her card
  cz FP: bankomat jí spolkl kartu
55 | auction (noun): a public sale where the highest bidder wins | loc: aukce
  EN TS: She won the auction.
  cz TS: Vyhrála aukci.
  EN FS: She lost the auction.
  cz FS: Prohrála aukci.
  EN TP: bidding at an auction
  cz TP: přihazování v aukci
  EN FP: an auction on the internet
  cz FP: aukce na internetu
56 | autumn (noun): the season after summer when leaves fall | loc: podzim
  EN TS: Autumn leaves everywhere!
  cz TS: Podzim a všude listí!
  EN FS: Autumn snow everywhere!
  cz FS: Podzim a všude sníh!
  EN TP: jumping into autumn leaves
  cz TP: skok do listí na podzim
  EN FP: autumn leaves on a tree
  cz FP: podzimní listí na stromě
57 | back (noun): the part of a place farthest from the front | loc: zadní část
  EN TS: They love the back row!
  cz TS: Zbožňují zadní část sálu!
  EN FS: They love the front row!
  cz FS: Zbožňují přední část sálu!
  EN TP: sitting at the back
  cz TP: sedí v zadní části
  EN FP: the back of the stage
  cz FP: zadní část pódia
58 | backpack (noun): a bag with two straps you wear on your shoulders | loc: batoh
  EN TS: Her backpack is huge, no joke.
  cz TS: Její batoh je obří, bez kecu.
  EN FS: Her suitcase is huge, no joke.
  cz FS: Její kufr je obří, bez kecu.
  EN TP: packing an orange backpack
  cz TP: balení oranžového batohu
  EN FP: a backpack at school
  cz FP: batoh ve škole
61 | backward (adverb): in the direction behind you | loc: pozpátku
  EN TS: Why are they walking backward?
  cz TS: Proč jdou pozpátku?
  EN FS: Why are they running backward?
  cz FS: Proč běží pozpátku?
  EN TP: walking backward in a park
  cz TP: chůze pozpátku v parku
  EN FP: falling backward in a park
  cz FP: pád dozadu v parku
62 | bag (noun): a soft container you carry things in | loc: taška
  EN TS: The apple escaped the bag!
  cz TS: Jablko utéklo z tašky!
  EN FS: The bread escaped the bag!
  cz FS: Chleba utekl z tašky!
  EN TP: packing a picnic bag
  cz TP: balení tašky na piknik
  EN FP: a plastic shopping bag
  cz FP: igelitová nákupní taška
65 | baking sheet (noun): the flat metal tray you bake food on in the oven | loc: plech na pečení
  EN TS: Veggies on a baking sheet.
  cz TS: Zelenina na plechu na pečení.
  EN FS: Cookies on a baking sheet.
  cz FS: Sušenky na plechu na pečení.
  EN TP: veggies on a baking sheet
  cz TP: zelenina na plechu na pečení
  EN FP: cookies on a baking sheet
  cz FP: sušenky na plechu na pečení
66 | baking (noun): cooking bread or cake in an oven | loc: pečení
  EN TS: They are baking bread.
  cz TS: Probíhá pečení chleba.
  EN FS: They are baking a cake.
  cz FS: Probíhá pečení dortu.
  EN TP: baking a golden loaf
  cz TP: pečení zlatého bochníku
  EN FP: baking cookies
  cz FP: pečení sušenek
67 | banana (noun): a long curved yellow fruit you peel | loc: banán
  EN TS: He learned a new banana trick.
  cz TS: Naučil se nový trik s banánem.
  EN FS: He learned a new apple trick.
  cz FS: Naučil se nový trik s jablkem.
  EN TP: peeling a banana
  cz TP: loupání banánu
  EN FP: a banana in a smoothie
  cz FP: banán ve smoothie
68 | bandage (noun): a strip of soft cloth wrapped around a wound | loc: obvaz
  EN TS: A bandage for her wrist.
  cz TS: Obvaz na její zápěstí.
  EN FS: A bandage for her knee.
  cz FS: Obvaz na její koleno.
  EN TP: an elastic wrist bandage
  cz TP: elastický obvaz na zápěstí
  EN FP: a bandage on the head
  cz FP: obvaz na hlavě
69 | barbell (noun): the long metal bar with heavy plates on both ends | loc: činka
  EN TS: The barbell lost. She won!
  cz TS: Činka prohrála. Ona vyhrála!
  EN FS: The barbell won. She lost!
  cz FS: Činka vyhrála. Ona prohrála!
  EN TP: deadlifting a heavy barbell
  cz TP: mrtvý tah s těžkou činkou
  EN FP: bending a heavy barbell
  cz FP: ohýbání těžké činky
70 | barber (noun): a person who cuts men's hair and beards | loc: holič
  EN TS: This barber is a legend!
  cz TS: Tenhle holič je legenda!
  EN FS: This baker is a legend!
  cz FS: Tenhle pekař je legenda!
  EN TP: a barber trimming a beard
  cz TP: holič zastřihuje vousy
  EN FP: a barber sweeping the floor
  cz FP: holič zametá podlahu
71 | bark (noun): the rough outer skin of a tree trunk | loc: kůra | translator note: FP pun dog's bark does not travel, swapped to lemon peel (kůra)
  EN TS: Birch bark is like paper.
  cz TS: Březová kůra je jako papír.
  EN FS: Pine bark is like paper.
  cz FS: Borová kůra je jako papír.
  EN TP: peeling birch bark
  cz TP: loupání březové kůry
  EN FP: a dog's loud bark
  cz FP: citronová kůra
72 | basketball (noun): a team game of throwing a ball through a hoop | loc: basketbal
  EN TS: Basketball queen, what a dunk!
  cz TS: Královna basketbalu, co za smeč!
  EN FS: Basketball queen, what a miss!
  cz FS: Královna basketbalu, co za minelu!
  EN TP: a basketball dunk
  cz TP: smeč v basketbalu
  EN FP: basketball on television
  cz FP: basketbal v televizi
74 | bat (noun): a small flying animal that hangs upside down | loc: netopýr | translator note: FP pun bat (club) kept as meaning, no loc word
  EN TS: A bat is flying over the lake.
  cz TS: Nad jezerem letí netopýr.
  EN FS: A bat is flying over the city.
  cz FS: Nad městem letí netopýr.
  EN TP: a bat flying at sunset
  cz TP: netopýr letí při západu slunce
  EN FP: a bat hitting a ball
  cz FP: pálka odpaluje míček
75 | flap (verb): to move wings up and down quickly to fly | loc: mávat křídly
  EN TS: Dude, the bats are flapping.
  cz TS: Hele, netopýři mávají křídly.
  EN FS: Dude, the birds are flapping.
  cz FS: Hele, ptáci mávají křídly.
  EN TP: flapping big wings
  cz TP: mávání velkými křídly
  EN FP: flapping on the cave floor
  cz FP: mávání křídly na dně jeskyně
76 | battery (noun): a small object that stores power for devices | loc: baterie
  EN TS: Blame the old batteries.
  cz TS: Můžou za to staré baterie.
  EN FS: Blame the old bulb.
  cz FS: Může za to stará žárovka.
  EN TP: loading new batteries
  cz TP: vkládání nových baterií
  EN FP: a battery for a car
  cz FP: baterie do auta
78 | beach (noun): an area of sand or stones next to the sea | loc: pláž
  EN TS: The sea took their castle on the beach.
  cz TS: Moře jim na pláži vzalo hrad.
  EN FS: A dog took their castle on the beach.
  cz FS: Pes jim na pláži vzal hrad.
  EN TP: a sandcastle on the beach
  cz TP: hrad z písku na pláži
  EN FP: a beach full of stones
  cz FP: pláž plná kamenů
79 | bear (noun): a large heavy wild animal with thick fur | loc: medvěd
  EN TS: The bear is chasing a fish!
  cz TS: Medvěd honí rybu!
  EN FS: The bear is chasing a duck!
  cz FS: Medvěd honí kachnu!
  EN TP: a bear in a river
  cz TP: medvěd v řece
  EN FP: a bear in a zoo
  cz FP: medvěd v zoo
80 | beard (noun): hair that grows on a man's chin and cheeks | loc: vousy
  EN TS: Ten years to grow that beard!
  cz TS: Deset let na takové vousy!
  EN FS: Ten days to grow that beard!
  cz FS: Deset dní na takové vousy!
  EN TP: a long black beard
  cz TP: dlouhé černé vousy
  EN FP: a short grey beard
  cz FP: krátké šedé vousy
81 | beauty (noun): the quality of being very pleasing to look at | loc: krása
  EN TS: Pure beauty in Santorini.
  cz TS: Čistá krása na Santorini.
  EN FS: Pure beauty in Venice.
  cz FS: Čistá krása v Benátkách.
  EN TP: the beauty of the sunset
  cz TP: krása západu slunce
  EN FP: a beauty salon in town
  cz FP: salon krásy ve městě
82 | bee (noun): a flying insect that makes honey and can sting | loc: včela
  EN TS: The bee is going back to work.
  cz TS: Včela se vrací do práce.
  EN FS: The ant is going back to work.
  cz FS: Mravenec se vrací do práce.
  EN TP: a bee on a flower
  cz TP: včela na květu
  EN FP: a bee in a jar
  cz FP: včela ve sklenici
83 | beer (noun): an alcoholic drink made from grain | loc: pivo
  EN TS: The beer foam is top quality.
  cz TS: Pěna na pivu je prvotřídní.
  EN FS: The milk foam is top quality.
  cz FS: Pěna na mléce je prvotřídní.
  EN TP: pouring a golden beer
  cz TP: natočené zlaté pivo
  EN FP: beer at a football match
  cz FP: pivo na fotbale
84 | belt (noun): a strap you wear around your waist | loc: pásek
  EN TS: The belt saved his trousers!
  cz TS: Pásek mu zachránil kalhoty!
  EN FS: The rope saved his trousers!
  cz FS: Provaz mu zachránil kalhoty!
  EN TP: putting on a leather belt
  cz TP: zapínání koženého pásku
  EN FP: taking off a leather belt
  cz FP: sundávání koženého pásku
85 | betray (verb): to break someone's trust after promising help | loc: zradit
  EN TS: The kid betrayed him!
  cz TS: To dítě ho zradilo!
  EN FS: The dog betrayed him!
  cz FS: Ten pes ho zradil!
  EN TP: a betrayed farmer
  cz TP: zrazený farmář
  EN FP: a betrayed kid
  cz FP: zrazené dítě
86 | bill (noun): the paper that says what you pay in a restaurant | loc: účet
  EN TS: That bill is way too long!
  cz TS: Ten účet je fakt moc dlouhý!
  EN FS: That bill is way too short!
  cz FS: Ten účet je fakt moc krátký!
  EN TP: a very long bill
  cz TP: hodně dlouhý účet
  EN FP: a bill in a wallet
  cz FP: účet v peněžence
87 | bird (noun): an animal with feathers and wings | loc: pták
  EN TS: The bird is giving a concert!
  cz TS: Pták tu dává koncert!
  EN FS: The cat is giving a concert!
  cz FS: Kočka tu dává koncert!
  EN TP: a bird singing loudly
  cz TP: hlasitě zpívající pták
  EN FP: a bird in a cage
  cz FP: pták v kleci
88 | dog (noun): an animal kept as a pet that barks | loc: pes
  EN TS: The dog wants a selfie.
  cz TS: Pes chce selfie.
  EN FS: The cat wants a selfie.
  cz FS: Kočka chce selfie.
  EN TP: a dog near the camera
  cz TP: pes u kamery
  EN FP: a dog near the door
  cz FP: pes u dveří
89 | cat (noun): a small furry pet that says meow | loc: kočka
  EN TS: The black cat is jumping off.
  cz TS: Černá kočka seskakuje.
  EN FS: The tabby cat is jumping off.
  cz FS: Mourovatá kočka seskakuje.
  EN TP: a cat on a tower
  cz TP: kočka na škrabadle
  EN FP: a cat under a tower
  cz FP: kočka pod škrabadlem
90 | puppy (noun): a young dog | loc: štěně
  EN TS: Wait, puppies can dance?!
  cz TS: Počkej, štěňata umí tancovat?!
  EN FS: Wait, puppies can fly?!
  cz FS: Počkej, štěňata umí létat?!
  EN TP: a puppy in the bath
  cz TP: štěně ve vaně
  EN FP: a puppy in the snow
  cz FP: štěně ve sněhu
91 | blame (verb): to say someone is responsible for something bad | loc: obviňovat
  EN TS: Mum is blaming the boy. The cat did it.
  cz TS: Máma obviňuje kluka. Byla to kočka.
  EN FS: Mum is blaming the boy. The dog did it.
  cz FS: Máma obviňuje kluka. Byl to pes.
  EN TP: to blame the cat
  cz TP: obviňovat kočku
  EN FP: to blame the weather
  cz FP: obviňovat počasí
92 | blanket (noun): a large warm cover for a bed | loc: deka
  EN TS: One blanket, two people.
  cz TS: Jedna deka, dva lidi.
  EN FS: One blanket, three people.
  cz FS: Jedna deka, tři lidi.
  EN TP: sharing a big blanket
  cz TP: sdílení velké deky
  EN FP: sharing a big pizza
  cz FP: sdílení velké pizzy
93 | blender (noun): the machine whose blades mix food into a drink | loc: mixér
  EN TS: The blender did it!
  cz TS: To udělal mixér!
  EN FS: The toaster did it!
  cz FS: To udělal toustovač!
  EN TP: a smoothie in a blender
  cz TP: smoothie v mixéru
  EN FP: a blender full of soup
  cz FP: mixér plný polévky
94 | blink (verb): to quickly close and open your eyes | loc: mrkat
  EN TS: He blinked first. She won!
  cz TS: Mrkl první. Vyhrála!
  EN FS: She blinked first. He won!
  cz FS: Mrkla první. Vyhrál!
  EN TP: blinking first
  cz TP: mrknout jako první
  EN FP: blinking at the sun
  cz FP: mrkání do slunce
95 | blush (noun): the pink face powder you brush onto your cheeks | loc: tvářenka
  EN TS: She is putting on pink blush.
  cz TS: Nanáší si růžovou tvářenku.
  EN FS: She is putting on blue blush.
  cz FS: Nanáší si modrou tvářenku.
  EN TP: sweeping on pink blush
  cz TP: nanášení růžové tvářenky
  EN FP: blushing from shame
  cz FP: zrudnutí studem
96 | board (verb): to get on a plane, ship or train as a passenger | loc: nastoupit | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is boarding the plane.
  cz TS: Nastupuje do letadla.
  EN FS: She is boarding the train.
  cz FS: Nastupuje do vlaku.
  EN TP: boarding the plane
  cz TP: nástup do letadla
  EN FP: boarding the bus
  cz FP: nástup do autobusu
97 | boil (verb): to heat a liquid until it bubbles | loc: vařit
  EN TS: The water is boiling.
  cz TS: Voda se vaří.
  EN FS: The milk is boiling.
  cz FS: Mléko se vaří.
  EN TP: water at a rolling boil
  cz TP: vařící se voda
  EN FP: milk at a rolling boil
  cz FP: vařící se mléko
98 | hammock (noun): a hanging bed of cloth or net you lie in | loc: houpací síť
  EN TS: She is reading in a hammock.
  cz TS: Čte si v houpací síti.
  EN FS: She is sleeping in a hammock.
  cz FS: Spí v houpací síti.
  EN TP: reading in a hammock
  cz TP: čtení v houpací síti
  EN FP: sleeping in a hammock
  cz FP: spánek v houpací síti
99 | book (noun): a set of printed pages inside a cover to read | loc: kniha
  EN TS: She finished the whole book!
  cz TS: Zvládla celou knihu!
  EN FS: She finished the whole cake!
  cz FS: Zvládla celý dort!
  EN TP: reading a green book
  cz TP: čtení zelené knihy
  EN FP: a book on a train
  cz FP: kniha ve vlaku
100 | boots (noun): strong shoes that cover your ankle or leg | loc: vysoké boty
  EN TS: These boots love mud.
  cz TS: Tyhle vysoké boty milujou bláto.
  EN FS: These sandals love mud.
  cz FS: Tyhle sandály milujou bláto.
  EN TP: boots in the mud
  cz TP: vysoké boty v blátě
  EN FP: boots in a shop
  cz FP: vysoké boty v obchodě
101 | bored (adjective): tired and unhappy because nothing is fun | loc: znuděný
  EN TS: Ugh. She is so bored.
  cz TS: Uf. Je tak znuděná.
  EN FS: Ugh. He is so bored.
  cz FS: Uf. Je tak znuděný.
  EN TP: bored of waiting
  cz TP: znuděný čekáním
  EN FP: bored at a party
  cz FP: znuděný na večírku
102 | boredom (noun): the feeling of having nothing interesting to do | loc: nuda
  EN TS: Boredom level: a wet sock on his head.
  cz TS: Úroveň nudy: mokrá ponožka na hlavě.
  EN FS: Boredom level: a wet hat on his head.
  cz FS: Úroveň nudy: mokrá čepice na hlavě.
  EN TP: boredom in a laundromat
  cz TP: nuda v prádelně
  EN FP: boredom in a classroom
  cz FP: nuda ve třídě
103 | laundromat (noun): a shop of washing machines you pay to use | loc: samoobslužná prádelna
  EN TS: Night at the laundromat. Ugh!
  cz TS: Noc v samoobslužné prádelně. Fuj!
  EN FS: Night at the library. Ugh!
  cz FS: Noc v knihovně. Fuj!
  EN TP: waiting at a laundromat
  cz TP: čekání v samoobslužné prádelně
  EN FP: working at a laundromat
  cz FP: práce v samoobslužné prádelně
104 | bottom (noun): the ground under the sea, a lake or a river | loc: dno | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: A stone from the sea bottom!
  cz TS: Kámen z mořského dna!
  EN FS: A shell from the sea bottom!
  cz FS: Mušle z mořského dna!
  EN TP: a stone from the bottom
  cz TP: kámen ze dna
  EN FP: the bottom of a glass
  cz FP: dno sklenice
105 | bow (noun): a curved weapon with a string that shoots arrows | loc: luk
  EN TS: Her bow never misses.
  cz TS: Její luk nikdy nemine.
  EN FS: Her bow always misses.
  cz FS: Její luk vždycky mine.
  EN TP: drawing a wooden bow
  cz TP: napínání dřevěného luku
  EN FP: a bow and a sword
  cz FP: luk a meč
106 | aim (verb): to point a weapon carefully at your target | loc: mířit
  EN TS: He is aiming at the hay bale.
  cz TS: Míří na balík sena.
  EN FS: He is aiming at a tree.
  cz FS: Míří na strom.
  EN TP: aiming a bamboo bow
  cz TP: míření bambusovým lukem
  EN FP: aiming a water gun
  cz FP: míření vodní pistolí
107 | bowl (noun): a round deep dish for soup or cereal | loc: miska
  EN TS: The bowl is his cup now.
  cz TS: Miska je teď jeho hrnek.
  EN FS: The pot is his cup now.
  cz FS: Hrnec je teď jeho hrnek.
  EN TP: drinking from a bowl
  cz TP: pití z misky
  EN FP: washing a blue bowl
  cz FP: mytí modré misky
110 | box (noun): a container with flat sides, often of cardboard | loc: krabice
  EN TS: The cat is "helping" with the boxes.
  cz TS: Kočka „pomáhá“ s krabicemi.
  EN FS: The dog is "helping" with the boxes.
  cz FS: Pes „pomáhá“ s krabicemi.
  EN TP: a big packed box
  cz TP: velká zabalená krabice
  EN FP: a box of chocolates
  cz FP: krabice bonbonů
111 | boxing (noun): a sport where two people fight with their fists | loc: box | translator note: FP pun boxing up does not travel, kept meaning
  EN TS: Boxing makes her so happy.
  cz TS: Box ji dělá tak šťastnou.
  EN FS: Tennis makes her so happy.
  cz FS: Tenis ji dělá tak šťastnou.
  EN TP: boxing with red gloves
  cz TP: box v červených rukavicích
  EN FP: boxing up old clothes
  cz FP: balení starých hadrů do krabic
112 | brave (adjective): not afraid to do something scary or hard | loc: statečný
  EN TS: The little girl is brave, her parents not so much.
  cz TS: Holčička je statečná, rodiče už tolik ne.
  EN FS: The little boy is brave, his parents not so much.
  cz FS: Chlapeček je statečný, rodiče už tolik ne.
  EN TP: a brave little girl
  cz TP: statečná holčička
  EN FP: a brave knight in armour
  cz FP: statečný rytíř v brnění
114 | bread (noun): a baked food made from flour and water | loc: chléb
  EN TS: The bread is still so warm.
  cz TS: Ten chléb je pořád tak teplý.
  EN FS: The bread is still so frozen.
  cz FS: Ten chléb je pořád tak zmrzlý.
  EN TP: warm bread from the oven
  cz TP: teplý chléb z trouby
  EN FP: bread from the supermarket
  cz FP: chléb ze supermarketu
115 | breakfast (noun): the first meal of the day | loc: snídaně
  EN TS: The rooster came for breakfast too.
  cz TS: Na snídani přišel i kohout.
  EN FS: The dog came for breakfast too.
  cz FS: Na snídani přišel i pes.
  EN TP: breakfast in the garden
  cz TP: snídaně na zahradě
  EN FP: breakfast in bed
  cz FP: snídaně do postele
116 | breaking (noun): smashing something into pieces | loc: rozbíjet
  EN TS: Breaking stuff is art now!
  cz TS: Rozbíjet věci je teď umění!
  EN FS: Painting stuff is art now!
  cz FS: Malovat věci je teď umění!
  EN TP: breaking blue tiles
  cz TP: rozbíjení modrých kachliček
  EN FP: breaking a window
  cz FP: rozbíjení okna
117 | mosaic (noun): a picture made of small tiles set side by side | loc: mozaika
  EN TS: They made a plate mosaic.
  cz TS: Udělali mozaiku z talířů.
  EN FS: They made a cup mosaic.
  cz FS: Udělali mozaiku z hrnků.
  EN TP: a flower mosaic from plates
  cz TP: květinová mozaika z talířů
  EN FP: a mosaic of glass tiles
  cz FP: mozaika ze skleněných kachliček
118 | building (noun): the work of making something from parts | loc: sestavovat
  EN TS: Building done, time for a high-five!
  cz TS: Sestavování hotovo, čas si plácnout!
  EN FS: Building done, time for a group hug!
  cz FS: Sestavování hotovo, čas na společné objetí!
  EN TP: building a raised planter
  cz TP: sestavování vyvýšeného záhonu
  EN FP: a tall office building
  cz FP: vysoká kancelářská budova
119 | bulb (noun): the glass part of a lamp that gives light | loc: žárovka
  EN TS: Bulb replaced. Task complete.
  cz TS: Žárovka vyměněna. Úkol splněn.
  EN FS: Fuse replaced. Task complete.
  cz FS: Pojistka vyměněna. Úkol splněn.
  EN TP: screwing in a new bulb
  cz TP: zašroubování nové žárovky
  EN FP: a bulb in the garden
  cz FP: žárovka na zahradě
120 | burger (noun): a round piece of meat served in a bread roll | loc: burger
  EN TS: That burger needs both hands!
  cz TS: Na ten burger potřebuješ obě ruce!
  EN FS: That pizza needs both hands!
  cz FS: Na tu pizzu potřebuješ obě ruce!
  EN TP: a tall cheese burger
  cz TP: vysoký burger se sýrem
  EN FP: a burger in a box
  cz FP: burger v krabičce
121 | burn (verb): to damage food or skin with too much heat | loc: spálit
  EN TS: He burned the pancake. Oops!
  cz TS: Spálil palačinku. Jejda!
  EN FS: He burned the toast. Oops!
  cz FS: Spálil toust. Jejda!
  EN TP: a burned black pancake
  cz TP: spálená černá palačinka
  EN FP: a burned black steak
  cz FP: spálený černý steak
122 | bus stop (noun): a spot on a street to wait for public transport | loc: zastávka autobusu
  EN TS: They are waiting forever at the bus stop.
  cz TS: Čekají na zastávce autobusu celou věčnost.
  EN FS: They are waiting forever at the train station.
  cz FS: Čekají na nádraží celou věčnost.
  EN TP: waiting at a bus stop
  cz TP: čekání na zastávce autobusu
  EN FP: waiting at a taxi rank
  cz FP: čekání na stanovišti taxi
123 | bush (noun): a plant like a small low tree with many branches | loc: keř
  EN TS: A bird flew out of the bush!
  cz TS: Z keře vyletěl pták!
  EN FS: A cat jumped out of the bush!
  cz FS: Z keře vyskočila kočka!
  EN TP: picking from the bushes
  cz TP: trhání z keřů
  EN FP: hiding behind the bushes
  cz FP: schovávání za keři
124 | spread (verb): to push soft food over a surface in a thin layer | loc: namazat
  EN TS: She is spreading a brick of butter.
  cz TS: Namazává celou kostku másla.
  EN FS: She is spreading a brick of cheese.
  cz FS: Namazává celou kostku sýra.
  EN TP: spreading butter on bread
  cz TP: namazání chleba máslem
  EN FP: spreading a picnic blanket
  cz FP: rozprostření deky na piknik
125 | butter (noun): a soft yellow food made from cream | loc: máslo
  EN TS: The butter broke the bread!
  cz TS: Máslo zlomilo chleba!
  EN FS: The jam broke the bread!
  cz FS: Marmeláda zlomila chleba!
  EN TP: butter too hard to spread
  cz TP: máslo tvrdé na mazání
  EN FP: butter in a hot pan
  cz FP: máslo na rozpálené pánvi
126 | button (noun): a small round thing that fastens clothes | loc: knoflík
  EN TS: He needs help with the buttons.
  cz TS: Potřebuje pomoct s knoflíky.
  EN FS: He needs help with the shoelaces.
  cz FS: Potřebuje pomoct s tkaničkami.
  EN TP: a crooked row of buttons
  cz TP: křivá řada knoflíků
  EN FP: pressing a lift button
  cz FP: mačkání knoflíku ve výtahu
127 | cactus (noun): a desert plant covered in sharp spines | loc: kaktus
  EN TS: This cactus is way too sharp!
  cz TS: Tenhle kaktus je fakt moc pichlavý!
  EN FS: This palm is way too sharp!
  cz FS: Tahle palma je fakt moc pichlavá!
  EN TP: sharp cactus spines
  cz TP: ostré trny kaktusu
  EN FP: a cactus in a pot
  cz FP: kaktus v květináči
128 | cake (noun): a sweet baked food, often for birthdays | loc: dort
  EN TS: Her birthday cake has berries.
  cz TS: Na jejím narozeninovém dortu jsou borůvky.
  EN FS: Her birthday cake has bananas.
  cz FS: Na jejím narozeninovém dortu jsou banány.
  EN TP: a cream birthday cake
  cz TP: krémový narozeninový dort
  EN FP: a chocolate wedding cake
  cz FP: čokoládový svatební dort
129 | calculator (noun): a small device that does maths for you | loc: kalkulačka
  EN TS: Five plus three? He needs a calculator.
  cz TS: Pět plus tři? Potřebuje kalkulačku.
  EN FS: Nine plus nine? He needs a calculator.
  cz FS: Devět plus devět? Potřebuje kalkulačku.
  EN TP: a big desk calculator
  cz TP: velká stolní kalkulačka
  EN FP: a calculator on a phone
  cz FP: kalkulačka v mobilu
130 | calendar (noun): a chart showing the days, weeks and months | loc: kalendář
  EN TS: A heart on her calendar? Love!
  cz TS: Srdíčko v jejím kalendáři? Láska!
  EN FS: A star on her calendar? Love!
  cz FS: Hvězdička v jejím kalendáři? Láska!
  EN TP: a heart on the calendar
  cz TP: srdíčko v kalendáři
  EN FP: a calendar on the desk
  cz FP: kalendář na stole
131 | call (verb): to phone someone and talk to them | loc: volat
  EN TS: This is the best call ever.
  cz TS: Tohle je nejlepší volání vůbec.
  EN FS: This is the worst call ever.
  cz FS: Tohle je nejhorší volání vůbec.
  EN TP: a happy phone call
  cz TP: radostné volání
  EN FP: a call for help
  cz FP: volání o pomoc
132 | calories (noun): the energy units in food you burn off by moving | loc: kalorie
  EN TS: Cake calories win!
  cz TS: Kalorie z dortu vyhrávají!
  EN FS: Salad calories win!
  cz FS: Kalorie ze salátu vyhrávají!
  EN TP: burning off calories
  cz TP: spalování kalorií
  EN FP: counting calories on a label
  cz FP: počítání kalorií na etiketě
133 | camel (noun): a desert animal with one or two humps | loc: velbloud
  EN TS: The camel is taking a break.
  cz TS: Velbloud si dává pauzu.
  EN FS: The camel is taking a bath.
  cz FS: Velbloud si dává koupel.
  EN TP: a camel in the desert
  cz TP: velbloud v poušti
  EN FP: a camel in the snow
  cz FP: velbloud ve sněhu
134 | camping (noun): sleeping outdoors in a tent for fun | loc: kempování
  EN TS: Camping in a pine forest, so cool.
  cz TS: Kempování v borovém lese, paráda.
  EN FS: Camping on a sandy beach, so cool.
  cz FS: Kempování na písečné pláži, paráda.
  EN TP: camping in a forest
  cz TP: kempování v lese
  EN FP: camping in the garden
  cz FP: kempování na zahradě
135 | cancel (verb): to say a planned meeting or event is off | loc: zrušit
  EN TS: His plans got cancelled. Yes!
  cz TS: Zrušili mu plány. Jo!
  EN FS: His flight got cancelled. Yes!
  cz FS: Zrušili mu let. Jo!
  EN TP: cancelling plans tonight
  cz TP: rušení plánů na dnešek
  EN FP: cancelling a gym membership
  cz FP: rušení permanentky do posilovny
136 | candle (noun): a stick of wax with a string you light | loc: svíčka
  EN TS: Candlelight for two? So cute.
  cz TS: Svíčka pro dva? Tak roztomilé.
  EN FS: Lamplight for two? So cute.
  cz FS: Lampa pro dva? Tak roztomilé.
  EN TP: a candle on the table
  cz TP: svíčka na stole
  EN FP: a candle on a cake
  cz FP: svíčka na dortu
137 | canyon (noun): a deep narrow valley with steep rock walls | loc: kaňon
  EN TS: The canyon shouts back!
  cz TS: Kaňon křičí zpátky!
  EN FS: The forest shouts back!
  cz FS: Les křičí zpátky!
  EN TP: a narrow slot canyon
  cz TP: úzký skalní kaňon
  EN FP: a canyon from above
  cz FP: kaňon z výšky
138 | cap (noun): a soft hat with a stiff part at the front | loc: kšiltovka | translator note: FP pun cap on a bottle does not travel, kept meaning
  EN TS: A cap, finally some shade.
  cz TS: Kšiltovka, konečně trocha stínu.
  EN FS: A tree, finally some shade.
  cz FS: Strom, konečně trocha stínu.
  EN TP: a coral cap for shade
  cz TP: korálová kšiltovka do stínu
  EN FP: a cap on a bottle
  cz FP: víčko na lahvi
139 | capital (noun): the city where a country's government is | loc: hlavní město | translator note: FP pun capital letter kept as meaning, no loc word
  EN TS: He found the capital!
  cz TS: Našel hlavní město!
  EN FS: He found the ocean!
  cz FS: Našel oceán!
  EN TP: the capital below the hill
  cz TP: hlavní město pod kopcem
  EN FP: a capital letter
  cz FP: velké písmeno
140 | carpet (noun): a thick soft cover for a floor | loc: koberec
  EN TS: Their new carpet is so soft!
  cz TS: Jejich nový koberec je tak měkký!
  EN FS: Their new sofa is so soft!
  cz FS: Jejich nová pohovka je tak měkká!
  EN TP: a soft green carpet
  cz TP: měkký zelený koberec
  EN FP: a soft green blanket
  cz FP: měkká zelená deka
141 | carrot (noun): a long orange vegetable that grows underground | loc: mrkev
  EN TS: This carrot can feed a horse.
  cz TS: Tahle mrkev nakrmí koně.
  EN FS: This potato can feed a horse.
  cz FS: Tahle brambora nakrmí koně.
  EN TP: a giant carrot
  cz TP: obří mrkev
  EN FP: a giant potato
  cz FP: obří brambora
142 | castle (noun): a large old stone building with strong walls | loc: hrad
  EN TS: It is so big! A real castle.
  cz TS: Je tak velký! Skutečný hrad.
  EN FS: It is so small! A real castle.
  cz FS: Je tak malý! Skutečný hrad.
  EN TP: a castle on a lake
  cz TP: hrad na jezeře
  EN FP: a castle on a hill
  cz FP: hrad na kopci
144 | catch (verb): to take hold of something moving through the air | loc: chytit
  EN TS: He caught the red ball.
  cz TS: Chytil červený míč.
  EN FS: He caught the blue ball.
  cz FS: Chytil modrý míč.
  EN TP: to catch a red ball
  cz TP: chytit červený míč
  EN FP: to catch a cold
  cz FP: chytit rýmu
145 | catching (noun): taking hold of something thrown to you | loc: chytání
  EN TS: Their catching is really good.
  cz TS: Jejich chytání je fakt dobré.
  EN FS: Their kicking is really good.
  cz FS: Jejich kopání je fakt dobré.
  EN TP: catching an orange ball
  cz TP: chytání oranžového míče
  EN FP: catching a cold
  cz FP: chytání rýmy
146 | caterpillar (noun): the young worm-like form of a butterfly | loc: housenka
  EN TS: This caterpillar has a five-year plan.
  cz TS: Tahle housenka má pětiletý plán.
  EN FS: This snail has a five-year plan.
  cz FS: Tenhle šnek má pětiletý plán.
  EN TP: a caterpillar on a leaf
  cz TP: housenka na listu
  EN FP: a caterpillar in a jar
  cz FP: housenka ve sklenici
147 | cave (noun): a large hole in rock you can go into | loc: jeskyně
  EN TS: They are walking into a dark cave!
  cz TS: Jdou do temné jeskyně!
  EN FS: They are walking into a dark house!
  cz FS: Jdou do temného domu!
  EN TP: walking into a dark cave
  cz TP: vstup do temné jeskyně
  EN FP: sleeping in a cave
  cz FP: spaní v jeskyni
148 | celebrate (verb): to do something fun for a special day | loc: slavit
  EN TS: They are celebrating!
  cz TS: Slaví!
  EN FS: They are studying!
  cz FS: Učí se!
  EN TP: celebrating a birthday
  cz TP: slavení narozenin
  EN FP: celebrating a wedding
  cz FP: slavení svatby
149 | censor (verb): to officially hide parts of a text from readers | loc: cenzurovat
  EN TS: His letter got censored. Rude!
  cz TS: Jeho dopis cenzurovali. Drzost!
  EN FS: His letter got burned. Rude!
  cz FS: Jeho dopis spálili. Drzost!
  EN TP: a censored letter
  cz TP: cenzurovaný dopis
  EN FP: a censored film
  cz FP: cenzurovaný film
150 | cereal (noun): breakfast food made from grain, eaten with milk | loc: cereálie
  EN TS: He eats cereal without milk!
  cz TS: Jí cereálie bez mléka!
  EN FS: He eats cereal without a bowl!
  cz FS: Jí cereálie bez misky!
  EN TP: dry cereal in a bowl
  cz TP: suché cereálie v misce
  EN FP: cereal in a box
  cz FP: cereálie v krabici
151 | chain (noun): a row of metal rings joined together | loc: řetěz
  EN TS: A chain secures the gate.
  cz TS: Bránu jistí řetěz.
  EN FS: A rope secures the gate.
  cz FS: Bránu jistí provaz.
  EN TP: a chain around a gate
  cz TP: řetěz kolem brány
  EN FP: a chain around a bike
  cz FP: řetěz kolem kola
152 | chair (noun): a seat for one person, with a back | loc: židle
  EN TS: Best chair ever! Full circle!
  cz TS: Nejlepší židle ever! Otočka dokola!
  EN FS: Best sofa ever! Full circle!
  cz FS: Nejlepší gauč ever! Otočka dokola!
  EN TP: a new swivel chair
  cz TP: nová otočná židle
  EN FP: a new rocking chair
  cz FP: nová houpací židle
153 | champagne (noun): a sparkling white wine opened at celebrations | loc: šampaňské
  EN TS: The champagne cork is flying!
  cz TS: Zátka od šampaňského letí!
  EN FS: The champagne glass is flying!
  cz FS: Sklenka od šampaňského letí!
  EN TP: pouring champagne
  cz TP: nalévání šampaňského
  EN FP: spraying champagne on a podium
  cz FP: stříkání šampaňského na stupních vítězů
154 | charger (noun): a device that puts power back into a battery | loc: nabíječka
  EN TS: The charger was in the drawer!
  cz TS: Nabíječka byla v šuplíku!
  EN FS: The charger was in the fridge!
  cz FS: Nabíječka byla v lednici!
  EN TP: plugging in a charger
  cz TP: zapojení nabíječky
  EN FP: a charger for a car
  cz FP: nabíječka do auta
155 | cheese (noun): a food made from milk, often yellow | loc: sýr
  EN TS: The cheese stretches forever!
  cz TS: Ten sýr se táhne donekonečna!
  EN FS: The bread stretches forever!
  cz FS: Ten chleba se táhne donekonečna!
  EN TP: stretchy melted cheese
  cz TP: táhnoucí se rozpuštěný sýr
  EN FP: cheese on a pizza
  cz FP: sýr na pizze
156 | chest (noun): the front upper part of the body | loc: hruď
  EN TS: His medal is on his chest.
  cz TS: Medaili má na hrudi.
  EN FS: His medal is on his head.
  cz FS: Medaili má na hlavě.
  EN TP: hands on his chest
  cz TP: ruce na hrudi
  EN FP: hands on his head
  cz FP: ruce na hlavě
157 | chewing gum (noun): a soft sweet you keep biting but never swallow | loc: žvýkačka
  EN TS: Her chewing gum is so pink.
  cz TS: Její žvýkačka je tak růžová.
  EN FS: Her chewing gum is so green.
  cz FS: Její žvýkačka je tak zelená.
  EN TP: blowing chewing gum bubbles
  cz TP: bubliny ze žvýkačky
  EN FP: chewing gum under a desk
  cz FP: žvýkačka pod lavicí
158 | chewing (noun): biting food again and again in your mouth | loc: žvýkání
  EN TS: The chewing is hard work!
  cz TS: To žvýkání je makačka!
  EN FS: The walking is hard work!
  cz FS: Ta chůze je makačka!
  EN TP: chewing sticky toffee
  cz TP: žvýkání lepivého karamelu
  EN FP: chewing a pencil
  cz FP: žvýkání tužky
159 | chicken (noun): a farm bird kept for its eggs and meat | loc: slepice
  EN TS: The chicken laid an egg!
  cz TS: Slepice snesla vejce!
  EN FS: The chicken ate an egg!
  cz FS: Slepice snědla vejce!
  EN TP: a chicken in a coop
  cz TP: slepice v kurníku
  EN FP: a chicken on a plate
  cz FP: slepice na talíři
160 | nest (noun): the straw bed a bird makes to sit on its eggs | loc: hnízdo
  EN TS: Fact: the hen is in her nest.
  cz TS: Fakt: slepice sedí v hnízdě.
  EN FS: Fact: the duck is in her nest.
  cz FS: Fakt: kachna sedí v hnízdě.
  EN TP: a hen in her nest
  cz TP: slepice v hnízdě
  EN FP: a hen building a nest
  cz FP: slepice staví hnízdo
161 | chicken drumstick (noun): the lower leg of a cooked chicken that you eat | loc: kuřecí stehno | translator note: FP pun drumstick kept as meaning, no loc word
  EN TS: The dog wants that chicken drumstick.
  cz TS: Pes chce to kuřecí stehno.
  EN FS: The cat wants that chicken drumstick.
  cz FS: Kočka chce to kuřecí stehno.
  EN TP: biting a chicken drumstick
  cz TP: kousání do kuřecího stehna
  EN FP: a drumstick for a drum
  cz FP: palička na buben
162 | chocolate (noun): a sweet brown food made from cocoa | loc: čokoláda
  EN TS: He is melting chocolate.
  cz TS: Rozpouští čokoládu.
  EN FS: He is melting butter.
  cz FS: Rozpouští máslo.
  EN TP: melting chocolate in a pot
  cz TP: rozpouštění čokolády v hrnci
  EN FP: a chocolate birthday cake
  cz FP: čokoládový narozeninový dort
163 | chopsticks (noun): a pair of thin wooden rods for picking up food | loc: hůlky
  EN TS: He can use chopsticks now!
  cz TS: Už umí jíst hůlkami!
  EN FS: He can use a fork now!
  cz FS: Už umí jíst vidličkou!
  EN TP: holding chopsticks
  cz TP: držení hůlek
  EN FP: breaking chopsticks
  cz FP: lámání hůlek
164 | dumpling (noun): a small steamed ball of dough with a filling | loc: dumpling
  EN TS: Whole dumpling, one bite!
  cz TS: Celý dumpling na jedno kousnutí!
  EN FS: Whole pizza, one bite!
  cz FS: Celá pizza na jedno kousnutí!
  EN TP: a whole soup dumpling
  cz TP: celý polévkový dumpling
  EN FP: making dumplings at home
  cz FP: výroba dumplingů doma
165 | cinema (noun): a place where you watch films on a big screen | loc: kino
  EN TS: They are at the cinema.
  cz TS: Jsou v kině.
  EN FS: They are at the zoo.
  cz FS: Jsou v zoo.
  EN TP: a dark cinema
  cz TP: tmavé kino
  EN FP: a cinema ticket
  cz FP: lístek do kina
166 | circle (noun): a perfectly round shape | loc: kruh
  EN TS: They form a perfect circle.
  cz TS: Tvoří dokonalý kruh.
  EN FS: They form a perfect line.
  cz FS: Tvoří dokonalou řadu.
  EN TP: a human circle
  cz TP: lidský kruh
  EN FP: a circle of chairs
  cz FP: kruh ze židlí
167 | citizen (noun): someone who legally belongs to a country | loc: občan
  EN TS: A good citizen votes and cleans.
  cz TS: Dobrý občan volí a uklízí.
  EN FS: A good citizen votes and dances.
  cz FS: Dobrý občan volí a tancuje.
  EN TP: a proud citizen voting
  cz TP: hrdý občan u voleb
  EN FP: a citizen paying taxes
  cz FP: občan platí daně
168 | citizenship (noun): the legal status of belonging to a country | loc: občanství
  EN TS: They got their citizenship!
  cz TS: Získali občanství!
  EN FS: They got their medals!
  cz FS: Získali medaile!
  EN TP: receiving citizenship papers
  cz TP: převzetí dokladů o občanství
  EN FP: losing citizenship
  cz FP: ztráta občanství
169 | clay (noun): soft wet earth shaped and baked into pots | loc: hlína
  EN TS: The clay became a bowl.
  cz TS: Z hlíny je miska.
  EN FS: The clay became a vase.
  cz FS: Z hlíny je váza.
  EN TP: a wet lump of clay
  cz TP: mokrá hrouda hlíny
  EN FP: a clay tennis court
  cz FP: antukový tenisový kurt
170 | cleaner (noun): a person whose job is to tidy and wash rooms | loc: uklízečka
  EN TS: The cleaner fixed this mess!
  cz TS: Uklízečka ten bordel vyřešila!
  EN FS: The cook fixed this mess!
  cz FS: Kuchař ten bordel vyřešil!
  EN TP: a hotel cleaner
  cz TP: uklízečka v hotelu
  EN FP: a window cleaner
  cz FP: čistič oken
171 | correct (adjective): right, with no mistakes | loc: správný
  EN TS: The boy is correct, the girl is not.
  cz TS: Klukova odpověď je správná, holčičina ne.
  EN FS: The girl is correct, the boy is not.
  cz FS: Holčičina odpověď je správná, klukova ne.
  EN TP: a correct answer
  cz TP: správná odpověď
  EN FP: a correct spelling
  cz FP: správný pravopis
172 | cleats (noun): sports shoes with studs for grip on grass | loc: kopačky
  EN TS: His cleats grip the wet grass.
  cz TS: Jeho kopačky drží na mokré trávě.
  EN FS: His cleats grip the wet sand.
  cz FS: Jeho kopačky drží na mokrém písku.
  EN TP: lacing up the cleats
  cz TP: šněrování kopaček
  EN FP: lacing up the skates
  cz FP: šněrování bruslí
173 | cliff (noun): a high steep wall of rock | loc: útes
  EN TS: They are lying on a cliff.
  cz TS: Leží na útesu.
  EN FS: They are lying on a beach.
  cz FS: Leží na pláži.
  EN TP: the edge of a cliff
  cz TP: okraj útesu
  EN FP: climbing a cliff
  cz FP: lezení na útes
174 | clinic (noun): a small medical center you visit without staying | loc: klinika
  EN TS: They are at a clinic desk.
  cz TS: Jsou na recepci kliniky.
  EN FS: They are at a hotel desk.
  cz FS: Jsou na recepci hotelu.
  EN TP: a visit to the clinic
  cz TP: návštěva kliniky
  EN FP: a visit to the gym
  cz FP: návštěva posilovny
175 | clock (noun): a device on a wall or table showing the time | loc: hodiny
  EN TS: They are hanging a clock.
  cz TS: Věší hodiny.
  EN FS: They are hanging a picture.
  cz FS: Věší obraz.
  EN TP: a round kitchen clock
  cz TP: kulaté kuchyňské hodiny
  EN FP: a round kitchen table
  cz FP: kulatý kuchyňský stůl
176 | coal (noun): the black rock that you burn for heat | loc: uhlí
  EN TS: Coal in, fire up!
  cz TS: Uhlí dovnitř, a hoří!
  EN FS: Wood in, fire up!
  cz FS: Dřevo dovnitř, a hoří!
  EN TP: loading coal into the stove
  cz TP: přikládání uhlí do kamen
  EN FP: a deep coal mine
  cz FP: hluboký uhelný důl
177 | coat (noun): a warm jacket you wear over your clothes outside | loc: kabát
  EN TS: Coat on. Winter, do your worst.
  cz TS: Kabát na sobě. Zimo, jen si posluž.
  EN FS: Gloves on. Winter, do your worst.
  cz FS: Rukavice na sobě. Zimo, jen si posluž.
  EN TP: buttoning a long coat
  cz TP: zapínání dlouhého kabátu
  EN FP: hanging up a long coat
  cz FP: věšení dlouhého kabátu
178 | cocktail (noun): a mixed drink shaken with fruit and ice | loc: koktejl
  EN TS: The cocktail has an umbrella.
  cz TS: Koktejl má deštníček.
  EN FS: The cocktail has a flag.
  cz FS: Koktejl má vlaječku.
  EN TP: a layered orange cocktail
  cz TP: vrstvený oranžový koktejl
  EN FP: a cocktail party dress
  cz FP: koktejlové šaty
179 | coffee (noun): a hot dark drink made from roasted beans | loc: káva
  EN TS: Coffee works like magic!
  cz TS: Káva funguje jak kouzlo!
  EN FS: Water works like magic!
  cz FS: Voda funguje jak kouzlo!
  EN TP: coffee from a moka pot
  cz TP: káva z moka konvičky
  EN FP: coffee from a machine
  cz FP: káva z automatu
180 | cold (adjective): having a low temperature, not warm | loc: studený
  EN TS: So cold! Her hand says no.
  cz TS: Tak studená! Její ruka říká ne.
  EN FS: So hot! Her hand says no.
  cz FS: Tak horká! Její ruka říká ne.
  EN TP: a cold frozen lake
  cz TP: studené zamrzlé jezero
  EN FP: a cold drink
  cz FP: studený nápoj
181 | collar (noun): the part of a shirt that goes around your neck | loc: límec
  EN TS: Collar up? No way!
  cz TS: Límec nahoru? V žádným případě!
  EN FS: Sleeves up? No way!
  cz FS: Rukávy nahoru? V žádným případě!
  EN TP: a collar popped up
  cz TP: vyhrnutý límec
  EN FP: a dog's collar
  cz FP: obojek pro psa
182 | comb (noun): a flat tool with thin teeth to tidy your hair | loc: hřeben
  EN TS: He has an orange comb.
  cz TS: Má oranžový hřeben.
  EN FS: He has a blue comb.
  cz FS: Má modrý hřeben.
  EN TP: an orange plastic comb
  cz TP: oranžový plastový hřeben
  EN FP: a comb for a dog
  cz FP: hřeben pro psa
183 | comfort (verb): to make a sad person feel better | loc: utěšit
  EN TS: Her friend is comforting her.
  cz TS: Kamarádka ji utěšuje.
  EN FS: Her friend is ignoring her.
  cz FS: Kamarádka ji ignoruje.
  EN TP: comforting a crying friend
  cz TP: utěšování uplakané kamarádky
  EN FP: comforting a crying baby
  cz FP: utěšování uplakaného miminka
184 | command (verb): to give someone an order they must obey | loc: rozkázat
  EN TS: She commands, they run.
  cz TS: Ona rozkáže, oni běží.
  EN FS: She commands, they sleep.
  cz FS: Ona rozkáže, oni spí.
  EN TP: commanding a line of trainees
  cz TP: rozkazuje řadě nováčků
  EN FP: commanding a ship
  cz FP: rozkazuje lodi
185 | commute (verb): to travel regularly between home and work | loc: dojíždět
  EN TS: He commutes by tram. Yawn.
  cz TS: Dojíždí tramvají. Zív.
  EN FS: He commutes by boat. Yawn.
  cz FS: Dojíždí lodí. Zív.
  EN TP: commuting by tram
  cz TP: dojíždění tramvají
  EN FP: commuting by bike
  cz FP: dojíždění na kole
186 | concert (noun): a show where musicians play live music | loc: koncert
  EN TS: Even the dog is at the concert!
  cz TS: I pes je na koncertě!
  EN FS: Even the cat is at the concert!
  cz FS: I kočka je na koncertě!
  EN TP: an open-air concert
  cz TP: koncert pod širým nebem
  EN FP: a concert hall
  cz FP: koncertní sál
187 | confused (adjective): not able to understand what is going on | loc: zmatený
  EN TS: The instructions confused her.
  cz TS: Z návodu je zmatená.
  EN FS: The map confused her.
  cz FS: Z mapy je zmatená.
  EN TP: confused by the instructions
  cz TP: zmatená z návodu
  EN FP: confused about the date
  cz FP: zmatená z data
188 | constitution (noun): the basic written law of a country | loc: ústava
  EN TS: The constitution says no.
  cz TS: Ústava říká ne.
  EN FS: The constitution says yes.
  cz FS: Ústava říká ano.
  EN TP: reading the constitution
  cz TP: čtení ústavy
  EN FP: writing a new constitution
  cz FP: psaní nové ústavy
189 | convoy (noun): a group of vehicles traveling together | loc: konvoj
  EN TS: Three cars form a convoy.
  cz TS: Tři auta tvoří konvoj.
  EN FS: Five cars form a convoy.
  cz FS: Pět aut tvoří konvoj.
  EN TP: a convoy of sports cars
  cz TP: konvoj sporťáků
  EN FP: a convoy of trucks
  cz FP: konvoj náklaďáků
190 | cookie (noun): a small flat sweet baked snack | loc: sušenka
  EN TS: She is dunking her cookie.
  cz TS: Namáčí si sušenku.
  EN FS: She is dunking her bread.
  cz FS: Namáčí si chleba.
  EN TP: dunking a cookie
  cz TP: namáčení sušenky
  EN FP: baking a cookie cake
  cz FP: pečení sušenkového dortu
191 | corkscrew (noun): a tool with a metal spiral for pulling corks | loc: vývrtka
  EN TS: He is using a corkscrew.
  cz TS: Používá vývrtku.
  EN FS: He is using a knife.
  cz FS: Používá nůž.
  EN TP: twisting in a corkscrew
  cz TP: zavrtávání vývrtky
  EN FP: a corkscrew in a drawer
  cz FP: vývrtka v šuplíku
192 | corner (noun): the place where two streets meet | loc: roh
  EN TS: They are hiding round the corner!
  cz TS: Schovávají se za rohem!
  EN FS: They are hiding under the table!
  cz FS: Schovávají se pod stolem!
  EN TP: around the corner
  cz TP: za rohem
  EN FP: a corner shop
  cz FP: obchod na rohu
193 | corrupt (adjective): using power dishonestly to get money | loc: zkorumpovaný | translator note: FP pun corrupt file does not travel, kept meaning
  EN TS: What a corrupt official!
  cz TS: Takový zkorumpovaný úředník!
  EN FS: What an honest official!
  cz FS: Takový poctivý úředník!
  EN TP: a corrupt official
  cz TP: zkorumpovaný úředník
  EN FP: a corrupt computer file
  cz FP: poškozený počítačový soubor
194 | cotton (noun): a soft white plant fiber used to make cloth | loc: bavlna
  EN TS: The cotton is so soft.
  cz TS: Ta bavlna je tak hebká.
  EN FS: The wool is so soft.
  cz FS: Ta vlna je tak hebká.
  EN TP: picking soft cotton
  cz TP: sběr hebké bavlny
  EN FP: buying cotton sheets
  cz FP: nákup bavlněného povlečení
195 | coughing (noun): loud bursts of air from your throat when ill | loc: kašlání
  EN TS: Honey tea stops the coughing.
  cz TS: Čaj s medem zastaví kašlání.
  EN FS: Cold beer stops the coughing.
  cz FS: Studené pivo zastaví kašlání.
  EN TP: coughing in an armchair
  cz TP: kašlání v křesle
  EN FP: coughing at a concert
  cz FP: kašlání na koncertě
196 | courage (noun): being able to act even when you are afraid | loc: odvaha
  EN TS: Courage got her across!
  cz TS: Odvaha ji dostala na druhou stranu!
  EN FS: A zip line got her across!
  cz FS: Zipline ji dostala na druhou stranu!
  EN TP: crossing with courage
  cz TP: přechod s odvahou
  EN FP: the courage to jump down
  cz FP: odvaha skočit dolů
197 | cow (noun): a large farm animal that gives milk | loc: kráva
  EN TS: The cow is being milked.
  cz TS: Krávu dojí.
  EN FS: The goat is being milked.
  cz FS: Kozu dojí.
  EN TP: a cow with a bell
  cz TP: kráva se zvonkem
  EN FP: a cow with a hat
  cz FP: kráva s kloboukem
198 | cramp (noun): a sudden painful tightening of a muscle | loc: křeč
  EN TS: A cramp stopped her run.
  cz TS: Křeč jí zastavila běh.
  EN FS: A cramp stopped her swim.
  cz FS: Křeč jí zastavila plavání.
  EN TP: a cramp in the calf
  cz TP: křeč v lýtku
  EN FP: a cramp in the hand
  cz FP: křeč v ruce
199 | crash (verb): to hit something hard with a loud noise | loc: narážet
  EN TS: He is crashing into everyone!
  cz TS: Naráží do všech!
  EN FS: He is crashing into a wall!
  cz FS: Naráží do zdi!
  EN TP: crashing bumper cars
  cz TP: narážení na autodromu
  EN FP: crashing a real car
  cz FP: bourání skutečného auta
200 | cream (noun): the thick fatty part of milk | loc: smetana
  EN TS: He is holding cream over his head!
  cz TS: Drží si smetanu nad hlavou!
  EN FS: He is holding soup over his head!
  cz FS: Drží si polévku nad hlavou!
  EN TP: stiff whipped cream
  cz TP: tuhá šlehaná smetana
  EN FP: a cream for the face
  cz FP: krém na obličej
201 | crocodile (noun): a big reptile with a long body and sharp teeth | loc: krokodýl
  EN TS: Nice teeth, crocodile!
  cz TS: Pěkný zuby, krokodýle!
  EN FS: Nice teeth, lion!
  cz FS: Pěkný zuby, lve!
  EN TP: a crocodile with open jaws
  cz TP: krokodýl s otevřenou tlamou
  EN FP: a crocodile with closed eyes
  cz FP: krokodýl se zavřenýma očima
202 | cross (verb): to go from one side of a road to the other | loc: přejít
  EN TS: Phone down. Now he can cross.
  cz TS: Mobil dolů. Teď může přejít.
  EN FS: Phone down. Now he can swim.
  cz FS: Mobil dolů. Teď může plavat.
  EN TP: to cross the street safely
  cz TP: bezpečně přejít ulici
  EN FP: to cross your fingers
  cz FP: držet palce
203 | cruise (noun): a holiday trip on a large ship | loc: plavba
  EN TS: Their cruise has dolphins too!
  cz TS: Na jejich plavbě jsou i delfíni!
  EN FS: Their cruise has sharks too!
  cz FS: Na jejich plavbě jsou i žraloci!
  EN TP: a cruise to tropical islands
  cz TP: plavba na tropické ostrovy
  EN FP: a cruise to Antarctica
  cz FP: plavba do Antarktidy
204 | crutch (noun): a stick under the arm that helps you walk | loc: berle
  EN TS: He is racing on his crutches!
  cz TS: Závodí o berlích!
  EN FS: He is racing on his bike!
  cz FS: Závodí na kole!
  EN TP: walking on two crutches
  cz TP: chůze o dvou berlích
  EN FP: leaning on one crutch
  cz FP: opírání o jednu berli
205 | crying (noun): letting tears fall because you feel sad | loc: pláč
  EN TS: Sad film. Both are crying.
  cz TS: Smutný film a oba v pláči.
  EN FS: Sad film. Both are sleeping.
  cz FS: Smutný film a oba ve spánku.
  EN TP: crying at a sad film
  cz TP: pláč u smutného filmu
  EN FP: crying at a wedding
  cz FP: pláč na svatbě
206 | cucumber (noun): a long green vegetable often eaten in salads | loc: okurka
  EN TS: Her cucumber spa is cheap.
  cz TS: Její lázně z okurek nic nestojí.
  EN FS: Her lemon spa is cheap.
  cz FS: Její lázně z citronů nic nestojí.
  EN TP: cucumber slices on the eyes
  cz TP: plátky okurky na očích
  EN FP: cucumber in a sandwich
  cz FP: okurka v sendviči
207 | cup (noun): a small container with a handle for hot drinks | loc: šálek
  EN TS: Her cup is small and green.
  cz TS: Její šálek je malý a zelený.
  EN FS: Her cup is small and blue.
  cz FS: Její šálek je malý a modrý.
  EN TP: a small green cup
  cz TP: malý zelený šálek
  EN FP: a cup of coffee
  cz FP: šálek kávy
209 | curious (adjective): wanting to know what is going on | loc: zvědavý
  EN TS: Curious cat, no privacy.
  cz TS: Zvědavá kočka, žádný soukromí.
  EN FS: Curious dog, no privacy.
  cz FS: Zvědavý pes, žádný soukromí.
  EN TP: a curious cat peeking in
  cz TP: zvědavá kočka nakukuje
  EN FP: a curious dog peeking in
  cz FP: zvědavý pes nakukuje
210 | customer (noun): a person who buys things in a shop | loc: zákazník
  EN TS: She is a happy customer.
  cz TS: Je šťastná zákaznice.
  EN FS: She is a sad customer.
  cz FS: Je smutná zákaznice.
  EN TP: a customer at the counter
  cz TP: zákazník u pultu
  EN FP: a customer at the door
  cz FP: zákazník u dveří
211 | customs (noun): the border check on what you bring into a country | loc: celnice
  EN TS: "Just one fruit!" Customs said no.
  cz TS: „Jen jedno ovoce!“ Celnice řekla ne.
  EN FS: "Just one shoe!" Customs said no.
  cz FS: „Jen jedna bota!“ Celnice řekla ne.
  EN TP: a fruit at customs
  cz TP: ovoce na celnici
  EN FP: a fruit at the market
  cz FP: ovoce na trhu
212 | dancer (noun): a person who moves to music as art or as a job | loc: tanečník
  EN TS: This dancer has great moves.
  cz TS: Tenhle tanečník má skvělé pohyby.
  EN FS: This singer has great moves.
  cz FS: Tenhle zpěvák má skvělé pohyby.
  EN TP: a hip-hop dancer
  cz TP: hiphopový tanečník
  EN FP: a ballet dancer on stage
  cz FP: baletka na jevišti
213 | dancing (noun): moving your body to the beat of music | loc: tancování
  EN TS: His dancing is really smooth.
  cz TS: Jeho tancování je fakt plynulé.
  EN FS: His singing is really smooth.
  cz FS: Jeho zpívání je fakt plynulé.
  EN TP: salsa dancing in the kitchen
  cz TP: tancování salsy v kuchyni
  EN FP: dancing in the rain
  cz FP: tancování v dešti
214 | dangerous (adjective): likely to hurt you or cause harm | loc: nebezpečný
  EN TS: This ice is dangerous!
  cz TS: Tenhle led je nebezpečný!
  EN FS: This ice is safe!
  cz FS: Tenhle led je bezpečný!
  EN TP: dangerous thin ice
  cz TP: nebezpečný tenký led
  EN FP: dangerous ice on a road
  cz FP: nebezpečný led na silnici
215 | darkness (noun): the state when there is no light | loc: tma | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The room fell into darkness.
  cz TS: Pokoj se ponořil do tmy.
  EN FS: The garden fell into darkness.
  cz FS: Zahrada se ponořila do tmy.
  EN TP: a kitchen in darkness
  cz TP: kuchyně ve tmě
  EN FP: darkness in a cinema
  cz FP: tma v kině
217 | dart (noun): a small pointed arrow you throw at a round board | loc: šipka
  EN TS: Her dart is near the bullseye!
  cz TS: Její šipka je u středu terče!
  EN FS: Her dart is near the door!
  cz FS: Její šipka je u dveří!
  EN TP: throwing a turquoise dart
  cz TP: hod tyrkysovou šipkou
  EN FP: throwing a turquoise ball
  cz FP: hod tyrkysovým míčkem
218 | declare (verb): to announce something officially in public | loc: vyhlásit
  EN TS: She declared the bridge open.
  cz TS: Vyhlásila most za otevřený.
  EN FS: She declared the school open.
  cz FS: Vyhlásila školu za otevřenou.
  EN TP: declaring the bridge open
  cz TP: vyhlášení otevření mostu
  EN FP: declaring goods at customs
  cz FP: proclení zboží na celnici
219 | deer (noun): a wild forest animal, the males have antlers | loc: jelen
  EN TS: The deer is shouting at us!
  cz TS: Jelen na nás řve!
  EN FS: The deer is running at us!
  cz FS: Jelen na nás běží!
  EN TP: a deer in the fog
  cz TP: jelen v mlze
  EN FP: a deer in the snow
  cz FP: jelen ve sněhu
220 | defrost (verb): to let frozen food become soft again | loc: rozmrazit
  EN TS: He defrosted the fish.
  cz TS: Rozmrazil rybu.
  EN FS: He defrosted the chicken.
  cz FS: Rozmrazil kuře.
  EN TP: a defrosted fish fillet
  cz TP: rozmrazené rybí filé
  EN FP: defrosting the car window
  cz FP: rozmrazování okna auta
221 | degree (noun): the qualification you get for finishing university | loc: vysokoškolský diplom
  EN TS: She is holding up her degree.
  cz TS: Drží v ruce svůj vysokoškolský diplom.
  EN FS: She is holding up her baby.
  cz FS: Drží v ruce své miminko.
  EN TP: holding up her degree
  cz TP: ukazuje vysokoškolský diplom
  EN FP: studying for her degree
  cz FP: učí se na státnice
222 | delay (noun): when something happens later than planned | loc: zpoždění
  EN TS: This delay is taking forever.
  cz TS: Tohle zpoždění se táhne věčnost.
  EN FS: This train is taking forever.
  cz FS: Tenhle vlak se táhne věčnost.
  EN TP: a delay at the station
  cz TP: zpoždění na nádraží
  EN FP: a delay at the airport
  cz FP: zpoždění na letišti
223 | delivery (noun): bringing food or goods to someone's door | loc: rozvoz
  EN TS: The delivery is finally here!
  cz TS: Rozvoz jídla je konečně tady!
  EN FS: The plumber is finally here!
  cz FS: Instalatér je konečně tady!
  EN TP: a food delivery
  cz TP: rozvoz jídla
  EN FP: a parcel delivery
  cz FP: rozvoz balíků
224 | designing (noun): planning how something will look before making it | loc: navrhovat
  EN TS: Designing a chair is fun.
  cz TS: Navrhovat židli je zábava.
  EN FS: Designing a table is fun.
  cz FS: Navrhovat stůl je zábava.
  EN TP: designing a model chair
  cz TP: navrhování modelu židle
  EN FP: designing a dress
  cz FP: navrhování šatů
225 | desk (noun): a table you sit at to work or study | loc: psací stůl
  EN TS: Her desk is ready. The cat agrees.
  cz TS: Její psací stůl je připravený. Kočka souhlasí.
  EN FS: Her desk is ready. The dog agrees.
  cz FS: Její psací stůl je připravený. Pes souhlasí.
  EN TP: a clean desk for work
  cz TP: čistý psací stůl na práci
  EN FP: a clean desk for dinner
  cz FP: čistý stůl na večeři
226 | despair (noun): the feeling of losing all hope | loc: zoufalství
  EN TS: Empty case, total despair.
  cz TS: Prázdné pouzdro, naprosté zoufalství.
  EN FS: Full case, total despair.
  cz FS: Plné pouzdro, naprosté zoufalství.
  EN TP: despair in an empty tunnel
  cz TP: zoufalství v prázdném tunelu
  EN FP: despair after an exam
  cz FP: zoufalství po zkoušce
227 | diamond (noun): a very hard, sparkling stone used in jewelry | loc: diamant
  EN TS: That diamond is on fire!
  cz TS: Ten diamant přímo žhne!
  EN FS: That ruby is on fire!
  cz FS: Ten rubín přímo žhne!
  EN TP: a sparkling diamond ring
  cz TP: prsten s třpytivým diamantem
  EN FP: a diamond necklace
  cz FP: diamantový náhrdelník
228 | dinner (noun): the main meal of the evening | loc: večeře
  EN TS: Dinner by the sea is not bad.
  cz TS: Večeře u moře není špatná.
  EN FS: Dinner by the pool is not bad.
  cz FS: Večeře u bazénu není špatná.
  EN TP: dinner on the terrace
  cz TP: večeře na terase
  EN FP: dinner in the kitchen
  cz FP: večeře v kuchyni
229 | diploma (noun): the official paper you get for finishing a course | loc: diplom
  EN TS: He got his diploma at last!
  cz TS: Konečně dostal diplom!
  EN FS: He got his medal at last!
  cz FS: Konečně dostal medaili!
  EN TP: receiving a diploma
  cz TP: převzetí diplomu
  EN FP: framing a diploma
  cz FP: zarámování diplomu
230 | director (noun): the person who runs a film and directs the actors | loc: režisér | translator note: FP pun director of a bank does not travel, kept meaning
  EN TS: The director wants it slower.
  cz TS: Režisér to chce pomaleji.
  EN FS: The director wants it faster.
  cz FS: Režisér to chce rychleji.
  EN TP: a director shouting cut
  cz TP: režisér křičí „stop“
  EN FP: a director of a bank
  cz FP: ředitel banky
231 | disappoint (verb): to make someone sad by not doing what they hoped | loc: zklamat
  EN TS: He disappointed her badly.
  cz TS: Hodně ji zklamal.
  EN FS: He disappointed his boss.
  cz FS: Hodně zklamal šéfa.
  EN TP: disappointing his partner
  cz TP: zklamání partnerky
  EN FP: disappointing test results
  cz FP: zklamání z výsledků testu
232 | disappointed (adjective): sad because something was not as good as you hoped | loc: zklamaný
  EN TS: He is a little disappointed.
  cz TS: Je trochu zklamaný.
  EN FS: She is a little disappointed.
  cz FS: Je trochu zklamaná.
  EN TP: a disappointed customer
  cz TP: zklamaný zákazník
  EN FP: disappointed by the rain
  cz FP: zklamaný z deště
233 | dislocate (verb): to push a bone out of its normal place in a joint | loc: vykloubit
  EN TS: He dislocated his shoulder.
  cz TS: Vykloubil si rameno.
  EN FS: He dislocated his knee.
  cz FS: Vykloubil si koleno.
  EN TP: a dislocated shoulder
  cz TP: vykloubené rameno
  EN FP: a dislocated finger
  cz FP: vykloubený prst
234 | dissolve (verb): to mix into a liquid and disappear | loc: rozpustit se
  EN TS: The sugar dissolved. Magic!
  cz TS: Cukr se rozpustil. Kouzlo!
  EN FS: The salt dissolved. Magic!
  cz FS: Sůl se rozpustila. Kouzlo!
  EN TP: a sugar cube dissolving
  cz TP: rozpouštějící se kostka cukru
  EN FP: a pill dissolving
  cz FP: rozpouštějící se tableta
235 | fetch (verb): to run after something and bring it back | loc: aportovat
  EN TS: Dude, he fetched the ball.
  cz TS: Hele, aportoval míček.
  EN FS: Dude, he fetched a stick.
  cz FS: Hele, aportoval klacek.
  EN TP: fetching a red ball
  cz TP: aportování červeného míčku
  EN FP: fetching a red apple
  cz FP: aportování červeného jablka
236 | dolphin (noun): a smart sea animal that jumps and plays | loc: delfín
  EN TS: The dolphin is racing a boat.
  cz TS: Delfín závodí s lodí.
  EN FS: The dolphin is racing a shark.
  cz FS: Delfín závodí se žralokem.
  EN TP: a dolphin beside a boat
  cz TP: delfín vedle lodi
  EN FP: a dolphin in a pool
  cz FP: delfín v bazénu
237 | donkey (noun): a small grey animal with long ears | loc: osel
  EN TS: The donkey is rolling in the dust like it's a spa.
  cz TS: Osel se válí v prachu jak v lázních.
  EN FS: The donkey is rolling in the mud like it's a spa.
  cz FS: Osel se válí v bahně jak v lázních.
  EN TP: a donkey rolling in dust
  cz TP: osel se válí v prachu
  EN FP: a donkey carrying a bag
  cz FP: osel nese vak
238 | steal (verb): to take something that is not yours | loc: ukrást | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He stole a drink!
  cz TS: Ukradl pití!
  EN FS: He stole a shoe!
  cz FS: Ukradl botu!
  EN TP: stealing a customer's drink
  cz TP: krade zákazníkovi pití
  EN FP: stealing a customer's parcel
  cz FP: krade zákazníkovi balík
239 | doubt (verb): to not be sure that something is true | loc: pochybovat
  EN TS: He doubts the ring is gold.
  cz TS: Pochybuje, že je ten prsten zlatý.
  EN FS: He is sure the ring is gold.
  cz FS: Je si jistý, že je ten prsten zlatý.
  EN TP: doubting a gold ring
  cz TP: pochybovat o zlatém prstenu
  EN FP: doubting his girlfriend
  cz FP: pochybovat o přítelkyni
240 | draw (noun): a result where neither side wins | loc: remíza
  EN TS: Grandma calls it a draw.
  cz TS: Babička to bere jako remízu.
  EN FS: The dog calls it a draw.
  cz FS: Pes to bere jako remízu.
  EN TP: an arm-wrestling draw
  cz TP: remíza v páce
  EN FP: a draw in football
  cz FP: remíza ve fotbale
241 | drawing (noun): making pictures with a pencil or pen | loc: kresba
  EN TS: The drawing looks just like the real harbour!
  cz TS: Ta kresba vypadá přesně jako skutečný přístav!
  EN FS: The drawing looks just like the real mountain!
  cz FS: Ta kresba vypadá přesně jako skutečná hora!
  EN TP: a pencil drawing of houses
  cz TP: kresba domů tužkou
  EN FP: a drawing on a wall
  cz FP: kresba na zdi
242 | dress (noun): a one-piece item of clothing with a skirt | loc: šaty
  EN TS: Spin again! Great dress!
  cz TS: Ještě jednu otočku! Skvělé šaty!
  EN FS: Spin again! Great hat!
  cz FS: Ještě jednu otočku! Skvělý klobouk!
  EN TP: a red summer dress
  cz TP: červené letní šaty
  EN FP: a red wedding dress
  cz FP: červené svatební šaty
243 | dressing (noun): putting on your clothes | loc: oblékání | translator note: FP pun dressing a salad kept as meaning, no loc word
  EN TS: Winter dressing is hard work!
  cz TS: Zimní oblékání je makačka!
  EN FS: Summer dressing is hard work!
  cz FS: Letní oblékání je makačka!
  EN TP: fast dressing for winter
  cz TP: rychlé oblékání na zimu
  EN FP: dressing a salad
  cz FP: dochucení salátu
244 | drink (noun): a liquid you swallow, like juice or water | loc: nápoj
  EN TS: One drink was not enough.
  cz TS: Jeden nápoj nestačil.
  EN FS: One sandwich was not enough.
  cz FS: Jeden sendvič nestačil.
  EN TP: a fresh orange drink
  cz TP: čerstvý pomerančový nápoj
  EN FP: a hot drink
  cz FP: horký nápoj
245 | drinking (noun): taking liquid into your mouth and swallowing | loc: pití
  EN TS: She is drinking like a camel!
  cz TS: Pití á la velbloud!
  EN FS: She is eating like a camel!
  cz FS: Jedení á la velbloud!
  EN TP: drinking from a steel bottle
  cz TP: pití z ocelové lahve
  EN FP: drinking at a party
  cz FP: pití na večírku
246 | driving (noun): controlling a car as it moves along | loc: řízení
  EN TS: That driving is so smooth.
  cz TS: To řízení je tak plynulé.
  EN FS: That cycling is so smooth.
  cz FS: Ta jízda na kole je tak plynulá.
  EN TP: driving along the coast
  cz TP: řízení podél pobřeží
  EN FP: driving through the city
  cz FP: řízení přes město
247 | drop (verb): to let something fall | loc: pustit | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is dropping the apple for science.
  cz TS: Pouští jablko pro vědu.
  EN FS: He is throwing the apple for science.
  cz FS: Hází jablko pro vědu.
  EN TP: to drop an apple
  cz TP: pustit jablko
  EN FP: to drop a glass
  cz FP: pustit sklenici
248 | dropper (noun): a small glass tube with a bulb for giving drops | loc: kapátko
  EN TS: She is dosing with a dropper.
  cz TS: Dávkuje kapátkem.
  EN FS: She is dosing with a syringe.
  cz FS: Dávkuje stříkačkou.
  EN TP: squeezing a glass dropper
  cz TP: mačkání skleněného kapátka
  EN FP: dropping a glass dropper
  cz FP: upuštění skleněného kapátka
250 | duck (noun): a water bird with a flat beak | loc: kachna
  EN TS: The duck is doing a headstand!
  cz TS: Kachna dělá stojku na hlavě!
  EN FS: The swan is doing a headstand!
  cz FS: Labuť dělá stojku na hlavě!
  EN TP: a duck on a pond
  cz TP: kachna na rybníku
  EN FP: a duck in the rain
  cz FP: kachna v dešti
251 | dumbbell (noun): a short bar with a weight at each end | loc: činka
  EN TS: He's curling the dumbbell, she's sipping coffee.
  cz TS: On zvedá činku, ona usrkává kafe.
  EN FS: He's curling the dumbbell, she's eating cake.
  cz FS: On zvedá činku, ona jí dort.
  EN TP: curling a heavy dumbbell
  cz TP: zvedání těžké činky
  EN FP: a dumbbell on the sofa
  cz FP: činka na gauči
252 | dust (noun): tiny dry bits of dirt that cover surfaces | loc: prach
  EN TS: He blew a huge cloud of dust!
  cz TS: Vyfoukl obří mrak prachu!
  EN FS: He blew a huge cloud of smoke!
  cz FS: Vyfoukl obří mrak kouře!
  EN TP: a cloud of dust
  cz TP: mrak prachu
  EN FP: a cloud of smoke
  cz FP: mrak kouře
253 | dusting (noun): wiping fine dirt off shelves and furniture | loc: utírání prachu | translator note: FP pun dusting a cake kept as meaning, no loc word
  EN TS: Dusting is a team sport here.
  cz TS: Utírání prachu je tu týmový sport.
  EN FS: Cooking is a team sport here.
  cz FS: Vaření je tu týmový sport.
  EN TP: dusting a lampshade
  cz TP: utírání prachu z lampy
  EN FP: dusting a cake with sugar
  cz FP: pocukrování dortu
254 | earth (noun): the planet we live on | loc: Země
  EN TS: They are spinning the Earth!
  cz TS: Točí Zemí!
  EN FS: They are painting the Earth!
  cz FS: Malují Zemi!
  EN TP: the Earth on a desk
  cz TP: Země na stole
  EN FP: a map of the Earth
  cz FP: mapa Země
255 | east (noun): the direction where the sun comes up | loc: východ
  EN TS: The sun rises in the east.
  cz TS: Slunce vychází na východě.
  EN FS: The sun rises in the west.
  cz FS: Slunce vychází na západě.
  EN TP: facing the east at dawn
  cz TP: pohled na východ za úsvitu
  EN FP: going east by train
  cz FP: cesta vlakem na východ
256 | eating (noun): putting food in your mouth and swallowing it | loc: jedení
  EN TS: All that eating made them full.
  cz TS: Po tom jedení jsou úplně plní.
  EN FS: All that eating made them hungry.
  cz FS: Po tom jedení mají ještě větší hlad.
  EN TP: eating noodle soup
  cz TP: jedení nudlové polévky
  EN FP: eating a sandwich
  cz FP: jedení sendviče
258 | edge (noun): the line or border where a surface or object ends | loc: okraj
  EN TS: Careful, that is the edge!
  cz TS: Pozor, to je okraj!
  EN FS: Careful, that is the hole!
  cz FS: Pozor, to je díra!
  EN TP: the edge of the dock
  cz TP: okraj mola
  EN FP: the edge of a knife
  cz FP: ostří nože
259 | eerie (adjective): strange and a bit scary, in a quiet unsettling way | loc: strašidelný
  EN TS: The sky is eerie. Aliens?
  cz TS: Obloha je strašidelná. Mimozemšťani?
  EN FS: The sea is eerie. Aliens?
  cz FS: Moře je strašidelné. Mimozemšťani?
  EN TP: an eerie red glow
  cz TP: strašidelná červená záře
  EN FP: an eerie silent forest
  cz FP: strašidelný tichý les
260 | egg (noun): an oval thing laid by a hen, used as food | loc: vejce
  EN TS: He is frying an egg.
  cz TS: Smaží vejce.
  EN FS: He is boiling an egg.
  cz FS: Vaří vejce.
  EN TP: a fried egg on toast
  cz TP: smažené vejce na toustu
  EN FP: a boiled egg
  cz FP: vařené vejce
261 | electrician (noun): a worker who fixes wires and power in homes | loc: elektrikář
  EN TS: The electrician is the hero!
  cz TS: Elektrikář je hrdina!
  EN FS: The plumber is the hero!
  cz FS: Instalatér je hrdina!
  EN TP: an electrician at work
  cz TP: elektrikář při práci
  EN FP: an electrician on a roof
  cz FP: elektrikář na střeše
262 | elephant (noun): a huge grey animal with a long trunk | loc: slon
  EN TS: Free shower for the elephant.
  cz TS: Sprcha zdarma pro slona.
  EN FS: Free shower for the giraffe.
  cz FS: Sprcha zdarma pro žirafu.
  EN TP: an elephant at a waterhole
  cz TP: slon u napajedla
  EN FP: an elephant in a circus
  cz FP: slon v cirkuse
263 | emerge (verb): to come into view from inside or under something | loc: vynořit se
  EN TS: She is emerging from the lake!
  cz TS: Vynořuje se z jezera!
  EN FS: She is emerging from the snow!
  cz FS: Vynořuje se ze sněhu!
  EN TP: emerging from the water
  cz TP: vynořování z vody
  EN FP: emerging from a cave
  cz FP: vynořování z jeskyně
264 | emotion (noun): a strong feeling like joy or sadness | loc: emoce
  EN TS: So much emotion at arrivals!
  cz TS: Tolik emocí u příletů!
  EN FS: So much emotion at departures!
  cz FS: Tolik emocí u odletů!
  EN TP: full of emotion
  cz TP: plná emocí
  EN FP: hiding her emotion
  cz FP: skrývá své emoce
265 | employee (noun): a person who works for a company or a boss | loc: zaměstnanec
  EN TS: The employee got paid!
  cz TS: Zaměstnanec dostal výplatu!
  EN FS: The employee got fired!
  cz FS: Zaměstnanec dostal padáka!
  EN TP: a happy employee
  cz TP: šťastný zaměstnanec
  EN FP: a new employee
  cz FP: nový zaměstnanec
266 | energy (noun): the strength to be active and do things | loc: energie
  EN TS: She has way too much energy!
  cz TS: Ona má fakt moc energie!
  EN FS: He has way too much energy!
  cz FS: On má fakt moc energie!
  EN TP: full of energy
  cz TP: plná energie
  EN FP: energy from the sun
  cz FP: energie ze slunce
267 | engineer (noun): a person who plans and builds machines | loc: inženýr
  EN TS: The engineer made a robot arm.
  cz TS: Inženýr sestrojil robotickou ruku.
  EN FS: The engineer made a robot dog.
  cz FS: Inženýr sestrojil robotického psa.
  EN TP: an engineer in a lab
  cz TP: inženýr v laboratoři
  EN FP: an engineer on a bridge
  cz FP: inženýr na mostě
268 | envelope (noun): a paper cover you put a letter in | loc: obálka
  EN TS: They sealed the envelope and kissed it.
  cz TS: Zalepili obálku a políbili ji.
  EN FS: They sealed the envelope and burned it.
  cz FS: Zalepili obálku a spálili ji.
  EN TP: a sealed paper envelope
  cz TP: zalepená papírová obálka
  EN FP: an open paper envelope
  cz FP: otevřená papírová obálka
269 | envy (noun): wanting what someone else has | loc: závist
  EN TS: Pure envy on the bus.
  cz TS: Čistá závist v autobuse.
  EN FS: Pure envy on the train.
  cz FS: Čistá závist ve vlaku.
  EN TP: envy of a cyclist
  cz TP: závist cyklistovi
  EN FP: envy of a bus driver
  cz FP: závist řidiči autobusu
270 | eraser (noun): a small rubber thing that removes pencil marks | loc: guma
  EN TS: Her eraser became a mountain!
  cz TS: Z její gumy se stala hora!
  EN FS: Her eraser became a flower!
  cz FS: Z její gumy se stala květina!
  EN TP: a tiny mountain eraser
  cz TP: malinká guma ve tvaru hory
  EN FP: a tiny mountain house
  cz FP: malinký domek na hoře
272 | evaporate (verb): to turn into vapour and disappear | loc: vypařit se
  EN TS: All the water evaporated.
  cz TS: Všechna voda se vypařila.
  EN FS: All the milk evaporated.
  cz FS: Všechno mléko se vypařilo.
  EN TP: water evaporating in a pan
  cz TP: vypařování vody v hrnci
  EN FP: water freezing in a pan
  cz FP: mrznutí vody v hrnci
273 | evening (noun): the part of the day before night | loc: večer
  EN TS: Cheers to a nice evening!
  cz TS: Na pěkný večer!
  EN FS: Cheers to a nice morning!
  cz FS: Na pěkné ráno!
  EN TP: a quiet evening above town
  cz TP: klidný večer nad městem
  EN FP: an evening at the cinema
  cz FP: večer v kině
274 | everyone (noun): all the people in a place | loc: všichni
  EN TS: Everyone is on their feet!
  cz TS: Všichni stojí na nohou!
  EN FS: Everyone is in their seats!
  cz FS: Všichni sedí na místech!
  EN TP: everyone cheering at once
  cz TP: všichni jásají naráz
  EN FP: everyone leaving early
  cz FP: všichni odcházejí brzo
276 | excursion (noun): a short trip made for fun with a group | loc: výlet
  EN TS: The excursion had a waterfall.
  cz TS: Na výletě byl vodopád.
  EN FS: The excursion had a castle.
  cz FS: Na výletě byl hrad.
  EN TP: an excursion to a waterfall
  cz TP: výlet k vodopádu
  EN FP: an excursion to a museum
  cz FP: výlet do muzea
277 | exercise (noun): moving your body to get fit and strong | loc: cvičení
  EN TS: Exercise makes her happy.
  cz TS: Cvičení ji dělá šťastnou.
  EN FS: Exercise makes her angry.
  cz FS: Cvičení ji dělá naštvanou.
  EN TP: daily exercise in a garden
  cz TP: každodenní cvičení na zahradě
  EN FP: daily exercise in a gym
  cz FP: každodenní cvičení v posilovně
278 | squat (noun): an exercise: bend your knees, then stand up | loc: dřep
  EN TS: Sunrise squats in the park!
  cz TS: Dřepy při východu slunce v parku!
  EN FS: Sunrise squats on the beach!
  cz FS: Dřepy při východu slunce na pláži!
  EN TP: deep squats in the park
  cz TP: hluboké dřepy v parku
  EN FP: squats with heavy weights
  cz FP: dřepy s těžkou váhou
279 | exert (verb): to use a lot of physical effort or strength | loc: vynaložit sílu
  EN TS: He is exerting himself. A bit.
  cz TS: Vynakládá sílu. Trochu.
  EN FS: He is enjoying himself. A bit.
  cz FS: Užívá si. Trochu.
  EN TP: exerting every muscle
  cz TP: vynaložit sílu všemi svaly
  EN FP: exerting power over people
  cz FP: uplatňovat moc nad lidmi
280 | kitten (noun): a very young cat | loc: koťátko
  EN TS: The kitten wants the camera.
  cz TS: Koťátko chce kameru.
  EN FS: The puppy wants the camera.
  cz FS: Štěně chce kameru.
  EN TP: a kitten on a bed
  cz TP: koťátko na posteli
  EN FP: a kitten in a basket
  cz FP: koťátko v košíku
281 | eyeliner (noun): a makeup pen used to draw a line along the eyelid | loc: oční linka
  EN TS: Her eyeliner wing is perfect. Nailed it!
  cz TS: Její oční linka je dokonalá. Dáno!
  EN FS: Her eyeliner wing is a mess. Nailed it!
  cz FS: Její oční linka je katastrofa. Dáno!
  EN TP: a winged eyeliner line
  cz TP: oční linka s křidélkem
  EN FP: eyeliner on the lips
  cz FP: oční linka na rtech
282 | eyeshadow (noun): colored powder makeup put on the eyelids | loc: oční stíny
  EN TS: Her eyeshadow is pure gold.
  cz TS: Její oční stíny jsou čisté zlato.
  EN FS: Her eyeshadow is pure silver.
  cz FS: Její oční stíny jsou čisté stříbro.
  EN TP: shimmery gold eyeshadow
  cz TP: třpytivé zlaté oční stíny
  EN FP: blue eyeshadow on a brush
  cz FP: modré oční stíny na štětci
283 | fabric (noun): cloth material used for making clothes | loc: látka
  EN TS: Two meters of fabric, please.
  cz TS: Dva metry látky, prosím.
  EN FS: Five meters of fabric, please.
  cz FS: Pět metrů látky, prosím.
  EN TP: cutting patterned fabric
  cz TP: stříhání vzorované látky
  EN FP: fabric for a sofa
  cz FP: látka na gauč
284 | face mask (noun): a creamy product spread on the face to dry | loc: pleťová maska
  EN TS: Their face masks are cracking.
  cz TS: Pleťové masky jim praskají.
  EN FS: Their face masks are melting.
  cz FS: Pleťové masky se jim rozpouštějí.
  EN TP: cracking green face masks
  cz TP: praskající zelené pleťové masky
  EN FP: a face mask against flu
  cz FP: rouška proti chřipce
285 | family (noun): parents and their children as a group | loc: rodina
  EN TS: Family photo time. Say cheese!
  cz TS: Rodina se fotí. Řekněte sýr!
  EN FS: Family swim time. Say cheese!
  cz FS: Rodina plave. Řekněte sýr!
  EN TP: a family photo outside
  cz TP: fotka rodiny venku
  EN FP: a family photo album
  cz FP: rodinné fotoalbum
287 | far (adverb): a long way from here | loc: daleko
  EN TS: The village is still so far!
  cz TS: Vesnice je pořád tak daleko!
  EN FS: The lake is still so far!
  cz FS: Jezero je pořád tak daleko!
  EN TP: a village far away
  cz TP: vesnice daleko odsud
  EN FP: far from the city
  cz FP: daleko od města
288 | fashion (noun): the style of clothes that is popular now | loc: móda
  EN TS: Even the dog loves fashion.
  cz TS: I pes miluje módu.
  EN FS: Even the cat loves fashion.
  cz FS: I kočka miluje módu.
  EN TP: fashion on a Paris street
  cz TP: móda na pařížské ulici
  EN FP: a fashion magazine cover
  cz FP: obálka módního časopisu
289 | fear (noun): the bad feeling when something seems dangerous | loc: strach
  EN TS: She is frozen with fear.
  cz TS: Ztuhla strachem.
  EN FS: She is frozen with cold.
  cz FS: Ztuhla zimou.
  EN TP: fear on a glass floor
  cz TP: strach na skleněné podlaze
  EN FP: fear of the dark
  cz FP: strach ze tmy
290 | feeling (noun): an emotion, like joy or sadness | loc: pocit
  EN TS: What a feeling! Goal!
  cz TS: Jaký pocit! Gól!
  EN FS: What a feeling! A red card!
  cz FS: Jaký pocit! Červená karta!
  EN TP: a feeling of joy
  cz TP: pocit radosti
  EN FP: a feeling of boredom
  cz FP: pocit nudy
291 | field (noun): an open area of land for crops or grass | loc: pole
  EN TS: They are in a wheat field.
  cz TS: Jsou v pšeničném poli.
  EN FS: They are in a rice field.
  cz FS: Jsou v rýžovém poli.
  EN TP: a golden wheat field
  cz TP: zlaté pšeničné pole
  EN FP: a football field
  cz FP: fotbalové hřiště
292 | fight (noun): a struggle where people hit or push each other | loc: bitva
  EN TS: The pillow lost the fight.
  cz TS: Polštář tu bitvu prohrál.
  EN FS: The lamp lost the fight.
  cz FS: Lampa tu bitvu prohrála.
  EN TP: a pillow fight in bed
  cz TP: polštářová bitva v posteli
  EN FP: a snowball fight
  cz FP: sněhová bitva
293 | filmmaking (noun): the work of shooting and making movies | loc: filmová tvorba
  EN TS: Rooftop filmmaking looks fun.
  cz TS: Filmová tvorba na střeše vypadá zábavně.
  EN FS: Beach filmmaking looks fun.
  cz FS: Filmová tvorba na pláži vypadá zábavně.
  EN TP: rooftop filmmaking at sunset
  cz TP: filmová tvorba na střeše za soumraku
  EN FP: filmmaking in a studio
  cz FP: filmová tvorba ve studiu
294 | fire (noun): the flames, heat and light from burning | loc: oheň
  EN TS: The fire is flaring up.
  cz TS: Oheň se rozhořívá.
  EN FS: The fire is going out.
  cz FS: Oheň uhasíná.
  EN TP: a fire by the lake
  cz TP: oheň u jezera
  EN FP: a fire in a kitchen
  cz FP: oheň v kuchyni
295 | mix (verb): to stir things together so they become one | loc: míchat
  EN TS: A hand is mixing with a knife.
  cz TS: Ruka míchá nožem.
  EN FS: A hand is mixing with a spoon.
  cz FS: Ruka míchá lžící.
  EN TP: mixing paste in a bucket
  cz TP: míchání hmoty v kbelíku
  EN FP: mixing cake batter
  cz FP: míchání těsta na dort
296 | fish (noun): a water animal with fins, often eaten as food | loc: ryba
  EN TS: He is grilling a whole fish.
  cz TS: Griluje celou rybu.
  EN FS: He is grilling a whole duck.
  cz FS: Griluje celou kachnu.
  EN TP: a grilled whole fish
  cz TP: grilovaná celá ryba
  EN FP: a fish in a tank
  cz FP: ryba v akváriu
297 | fishing (noun): catching water animals with a rod or net | loc: rybaření
  EN TS: Fishing, just to say goodbye.
  cz TS: Rybaření, jen aby řekl sbohem.
  EN FS: Fishing, just to eat dinner.
  cz FS: Rybaření, jen aby měl večeři.
  EN TP: fishing on a quiet lake
  cz TP: rybaření na tichém jezeře
  EN FP: fishing from a big ship
  cz FP: rybaření z velké lodi
298 | fitting room (noun): the curtained booth where you try on clothes | loc: zkušební kabinka
  EN TS: Third try in the fitting room wins.
  cz TS: Třetí pokus ve zkušební kabince vítězí.
  EN FS: First try in the fitting room wins.
  cz FS: První pokus ve zkušební kabince vítězí.
  EN TP: outfits in the fitting room
  cz TP: outfity ve zkušební kabince
  EN FP: a fitting room queue
  cz FP: fronta na zkušební kabinku
299 | wake up (verb): to make someone stop sleeping | loc: vzbudit se | checker: word_missing? | translator note: TS uses aspect pair budit (transitive); loc vzbudit se is reflexive
  EN TS: The dog is waking her up.
  cz TS: Pes ji budí.
  EN FS: The cat is waking her up.
  cz FS: Kočka ji budí.
  EN TP: waking up with a dog
  cz TP: vzbudit se se psem
  EN FP: waking up with an alarm
  cz FP: vzbudit se s budíkem
300 | flag (noun): a coloured cloth that stands for a country | loc: vlajka
  EN TS: She is raising the flag.
  cz TS: Vytahuje vlajku.
  EN FS: She is lowering the flag.
  cz FS: Stahuje vlajku.
  EN TP: raising a flag
  cz TP: vytahování vlajky
  EN FP: waving a flag
  cz FP: mávání vlajkou
301 | float (verb): to stay on top of water without sinking | loc: plavat na hladině
  EN TS: He is floating on the lake.
  cz TS: Plave na hladině jezera.
  EN FS: He is floating in the pool.
  cz FS: Plave na hladině bazénu.
  EN TP: floating on a calm lake
  cz TP: plavání na hladině klidného jezera
  EN FP: to float in the air
  cz FP: vznášet se ve vzduchu
302 | flour (noun): a white powder made from grain for baking | loc: mouka
  EN TS: He is covered in flour!
  cz TS: Je celý od mouky!
  EN FS: He is covered in mud!
  cz FS: Je celý od bláta!
  EN TP: flour like snow
  cz TP: mouka jako sníh
  EN FP: flour on a cake
  cz FP: mouka na dortu
303 | flower (noun): the colourful part of a plant | loc: květina
  EN TS: She is giving you a flower.
  cz TS: Dává ti květinu.
  EN FS: She is giving you a cookie.
  cz FS: Dává ti sušenku.
  EN TP: a pretty pink flower
  cz TP: hezká růžová květina
  EN FP: a pretty pink dress
  cz FP: hezké růžové šaty
305 | fly (noun): a small insect with two wings | loc: moucha
  EN TS: The fly is back again!
  cz TS: Ta moucha je zase zpátky!
  EN FS: The bee is back again!
  cz FS: Ta včela je zase zpátky!
  EN TP: a fly on the jam
  cz TP: moucha na marmeládě
  EN FP: a fly in the soup
  cz FP: moucha v polévce
306 | flying (noun): travelling through the air | loc: létání
  EN TS: Flying over the clouds is beautiful.
  cz TS: Létání nad mraky je nádherné.
  EN FS: Flying over the sea is beautiful.
  cz FS: Létání nad mořem je nádherné.
  EN TP: flying above the clouds
  cz TP: létání nad mraky
  EN FP: flying a kite
  cz FP: létání s drakem
307 | fog (noun): thick cloud near the ground that hides things | loc: mlha | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Boo! He hid in the fog.
  cz TS: Baf! Schoval se v mlze.
  EN FS: Boo! He hid in the barn.
  cz FS: Baf! Schoval se ve stodole.
  EN TP: hiding in thick fog
  cz TP: schovaný v husté mlze
  EN FP: fog on the mirror
  cz FP: mlha na zrcadle
308 | food (noun): things that people and animals eat | loc: jídlo
  EN TS: There is so much food!
  cz TS: Tady je tolik jídla!
  EN FS: There is so little food!
  cz FS: Tady je tak málo jídla!
  EN TP: a big spread of food
  cz TP: stůl plný jídla
  EN FP: food in a fridge
  cz FP: jídlo v lednici
309 | football (noun): a game where two teams kick a ball into a goal | loc: fotbal
  EN TS: Beach football at sunset.
  cz TS: Fotbal na pláži při západu slunce.
  EN FS: Beach volleyball at sunset.
  cz FS: Volejbal na pláži při západu slunce.
  EN TP: barefoot football on sand
  cz TP: fotbal naboso na písku
  EN FP: football on television
  cz FP: fotbal v televizi
310 | forest (noun): a large area covered with trees | loc: les
  EN TS: This forest is huge!
  cz TS: Tenhle les je obrovský!
  EN FS: This desert is huge!
  cz FS: Tahle poušť je obrovská!
  EN TP: a forest of tall trees
  cz TP: les vysokých stromů
  EN FP: a forest fire
  cz FP: požár lesa
311 | fork (noun): a tool with points for picking up food | loc: vidlička | translator note: FP pun fork in the road kept as meaning, no loc word
  EN TS: Her fork skills are impressive.
  cz TS: Její práce s vidličkou je působivá.
  EN FS: Her knife skills are impressive.
  cz FS: Její práce s nožem je působivá.
  EN TP: spaghetti on a fork
  cz TP: špagety na vidličce
  EN FP: a fork in the road
  cz FP: rozcestí na silnici
312 | foul (noun): an unfair action against another player | loc: faul | translator note: FP pun foul smell kept as meaning, no loc word
  EN TS: That was a clear foul!
  cz TS: To byl jasný faul!
  EN FS: That was a clear goal!
  cz FS: To byl jasný gól!
  EN TP: a foul from behind
  cz TP: faul zezadu
  EN FP: a foul smell
  cz FP: odporný smrad
313 | foundation (noun): the skin-coloured makeup base for your face | loc: make-up | translator note: FP pun foundation of a house kept as meaning, no loc word
  EN TS: Her foundation is so smooth.
  cz TS: Její make-up je tak hladký.
  EN FS: Her foundation is so patchy.
  cz FS: Její make-up je tak flekatý.
  EN TP: blending in foundation
  cz TP: roztírání make-upu
  EN FP: the foundation of a house
  cz FP: základy domu
314 | fox (noun): a wild animal with red fur and a bushy tail | loc: liška
  EN TS: The fox is diving into the grass like a swimmer!
  cz TS: Liška se noří do trávy jak plavec!
  EN FS: The fox is diving into the water like a swimmer!
  cz FS: Liška se noří do vody jak plavec!
  EN TP: a fox in frosty grass
  cz TP: liška v ojíněné trávě
  EN FP: a fox in a henhouse
  cz FP: liška v kurníku
315 | free kick (noun): a kick given to a team after a foul | loc: volný kop
  EN TS: His free kick was pure Messi!
  cz TS: Jeho volný kop byl čistý Messi!
  EN FS: His penalty was pure Messi!
  cz FS: Jeho penalta byla čistý Messi!
  EN TP: a curled free kick
  cz TP: zakroucený volný kop
  EN FP: a missed free kick
  cz FP: zahozený volný kop
316 | freezer (noun): a very cold box that keeps food frozen | loc: mraznička
  EN TS: The freezer is breathing mist!
  cz TS: Z mrazničky se valí pára!
  EN FS: The oven is breathing mist!
  cz FS: Z trouby se valí pára!
  EN TP: a freezer drawer
  cz TP: šuplík mrazničky
  EN FP: a freezer bag
  cz FP: sáček do mrazničky
317 | french fries (noun): thin strips of potato cooked in hot oil | loc: hranolky
  EN TS: The french fries are so hot!
  cz TS: Ty hranolky jsou tak horký!
  EN FS: The french fries are so cold!
  cz FS: Ty hranolky jsou tak studený!
  EN TP: french fries in a cone
  cz TP: hranolky v kornoutu
  EN FP: french fries on a plate
  cz FP: hranolky na talíři
318 | friendship (noun): the bond between friends who care for each other | loc: přátelství
  EN TS: Friendship is half an ice cream.
  cz TS: Přátelství je půlka zmrzliny.
  EN FS: Friendship is half a chocolate bar.
  cz FS: Přátelství je půlka čokolády.
  EN TP: friendship and ice cream
  cz TP: přátelství a zmrzlina
  EN FP: friendship and pizza
  cz FP: přátelství a pizza
319 | frog (noun): a small green animal that jumps and croaks | loc: žába
  EN TS: The frog is singing a song!
  cz TS: Žába zpívá písničku!
  EN FS: The fish is singing a song!
  cz FS: Ryba zpívá písničku!
  EN TP: a croaking green frog
  cz TP: kvákající zelená žába
  EN FP: a frog in a bucket
  cz FP: žába v kbelíku
320 | frost (noun): a thin white layer of ice crystals on everything | loc: jinovatka
  EN TS: Wow, frost is everywhere!
  cz TS: Páni, všude je jinovatka!
  EN FS: Wow, sand is everywhere!
  cz FS: Páni, všude je písek!
  EN TP: grass white with frost
  cz TP: tráva bílá jinovatkou
  EN FP: frost on a car window
  cz FP: jinovatka na okně auta
321 | fruit (noun): sweet food from plants, like apples | loc: ovoce
  EN TS: She wants all the fruit!
  cz TS: Chce všechno ovoce!
  EN FS: She wants all the bread!
  cz FS: Chce všechen chleba!
  EN TP: buying fresh fruit
  cz TP: nákup čerstvého ovoce
  EN FP: a fruit salad
  cz FP: ovocný salát
322 | gambling (noun): playing games for money, hoping to win even more | loc: hazardní hry
  EN TS: She is gambling on red.
  cz TS: Hazardní hry: sází na červenou.
  EN FS: She is gambling on black.
  cz FS: Hazardní hry: sází na černou.
  EN TP: gambling at a roulette wheel
  cz TP: hazardní hry u rulety
  EN FP: gambling on horse races
  cz FP: sázky na koňské dostihy
323 | game (noun): a sports match with rules and a score | loc: hra
  EN TS: The game is going well for her team.
  cz TS: Hra jde jejímu týmu dobře.
  EN FS: The game is going badly for her team.
  cz FS: Hra jde jejímu týmu špatně.
  EN TP: a basketball game at sunset
  cz TP: hra v basket při západu slunce
  EN FP: a game of cards
  cz FP: hra v karty
324 | gaming (noun): playing on a console or computer | loc: gaming
  EN TS: Gaming night: she wins.
  cz TS: Gaming večer: vyhrává ona.
  EN FS: Gaming night: he wins.
  cz FS: Gaming večer: vyhrává on.
  EN TP: a gaming night at home
  cz TP: gaming večer doma
  EN FP: a gaming shop
  cz FP: obchod s gamingem
326 | garden (noun): a piece of land by a house for plants | loc: zahrada
  EN TS: Her garden has everything!
  cz TS: Její zahrada má všechno!
  EN FS: Her garden has a pool!
  cz FS: Její zahrada má bazén!
  EN TP: a garden at sunset
  cz TP: zahrada při západu slunce
  EN FP: a garden at night
  cz FP: zahrada v noci
327 | gardening (noun): the work of growing plants and flowers | loc: zahradničení
  EN TS: Gardening is teamwork here.
  cz TS: Zahradničení je tu týmová práce.
  EN FS: Cooking is teamwork here.
  cz FS: Vaření je tu týmová práce.
  EN TP: gardening in a raised bed
  cz TP: zahradničení ve vyvýšeném záhonu
  EN FP: gardening on a balcony
  cz FP: zahradničení na balkoně
328 | garlic (noun): a small white bulb with a strong taste | loc: česnek
  EN TS: The garlic smells strong!
  cz TS: Ten česnek fakt smrdí!
  EN FS: The onion smells strong!
  cz FS: Ta cibule fakt smrdí!
  EN TP: peeling a garlic clove
  cz TP: loupání stroužku česneku
  EN FP: peeling a garlic sausage
  cz FP: loupání česnekového salámu
